


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/25/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.11
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							-$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/25/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.47%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/25/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.88%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Tue Jul 25 23:14:13 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now














































JPMorgan Total Return Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan Total Return Fund(JMTAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewPerformanceFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
  




Designed ToDesigned to deliver high total return through investing in a wide range of debt securities.ApproachUtilizes a dynamic approach that combines traditional fixed income with opportunistic investingEmploys a top-down, macro-driven approach to help mitigate risks of benchmark-constrained strategiesSelects investments by analyzing the performance potential of individual securities and different market sectors










Overview widget loading ...







Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William  Eigen Portfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: Total Return (A)




Commentary: Total Return







Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - Total Return Fund




Supplemental Data Sheet - Total Return Fund


Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan Total Return Fund







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 




Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 0.66% for A Shares, 1.31% for C Shares, 0.56% for I Shares, 1.16% for R2 Shares, 0.46% for R5 Shares and 0.41% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 6/30/2017 for A Shares, 6/30/2017 for C Shares, 6/30/2017 for I Shares, 6/30/2017 for R2 Shares, 6/30/2017 for R5 Shares and 6/30/2017 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index is an unmanaged index representing SEC-registered taxable and dollar denominated securities. It covers the U.S. investment grade fixed rate bond market, with index components for government and corporate securities, mortgage pass-through, and asset-backed securities. The performance of the Lipper Core Plus Bond Funds Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. The value of investments in mortgage-related and asset-backed securities will be influenced by the factors affecting the housing market and the assets underlying such securities. The securities may decline in value, face valuation difficulties, become more volatile and/or become illiquid. They are also subject to prepayment risk, which occurs when mortgage holders refinance or otherwise repay their loans sooner than expected, creating an early return of principal to holders of the loans. The Fund may use futures contracts, swaps, and derivatives in connection with its investment strategies. Derivatives are subject to the risk that changes in the value of a derivative may not correlate perfectly with the underlying asset, rate or index.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Principle #1: Plan on Living a Long Time - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar








PRINCIPLE #1: PLAN ON LIVING A LONG TIME

DON’T LET YOUR CLIENTS' MONEY RUN OUT

Your clients are living longer, and many of them haven't saved enough. Use our Principles for Successful Long-Term Investing to talk to them about this reality, and to help them be prepared.
ACCESS ALL 7 PRINCIPLES







 














We are living longer

Thanks to advances in medicine and healthier lifestyles, people who are 65 today have a very good chance of reaching ages 80 or 90. A 65-year-old couple might be surprised to learn that at least one of them has a 48% probability of living another 25 years and needing investments to last until age 90.

	 

Many of us have not saved enough

Studies reveal that individuals do not feel adequately prepared for retirement. Investors should start early by saving more, investing with discipline and having a plan for their future.

	 

	 

Explore More Principles

Learn more about successful long-term investing
   NEXT PRINCIPLE   >   






4 STRATEGIES FOR LONG-TERM INVESTORS

We offer investment strategies covering all asset classes for diversification and risk management to help you and your clients build stronger portfolios.
ACCESS 4 HIGH CONVICTION FUNDS



Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 



















Tools & Resources - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Tools & Resources
			
Email ThisPrint




Target Date CompassSM



	An industry-leading target date fund evaluation tool, Target Date CompassSM, was the first of its kind to use a standardized, systematic process for evaluating and selecting target date funds.


USE TARGET DATE COMPASS 




Morningstar® Tools

Hypothetical Illustrations 
                         


	You can simulate a hypothetical experience of a portfolio over a specific past timeframe using actual performance data for an individual fund or portfolio of funds.


Hypothetical Tool 





Multi-Fund Comparisons
                         


	Compare multiple securities in terms of performance, portfolio, operations, and risk data. You can also generate a FINRA-reviewed Multiple Fund Comparison report. 


Compare Funds 





Portfolio Analysis
                         


	Analyze existing client portfolios based on current available Morningstar® data, or view aggregate statistics for a set of chosen investments.


Analyze portfolio 








Insights app
                         


	Make the complex clearer for your clients. This app is a powerful way for advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan's Insights for their clients.


Get the Insights App






Additional  Tools & Resources




Shareholder Account Access 
                         

                            Our site provides a powerful way to access your account with J.P. Morgan Funds.

	We hope you find it easy to use and full of helpful features.


LOG IN OR REGISTER NOW 




Shareholder Account Resources
                         



Shareholder Account Resources  
Tax Planning Information Documents  
Money Market Reform resources  







TARGET DATE FUNDS. Target date funds are funds with the target date being the approximate date when investors plan to start withdrawing their money. Generally, the asset allocation of each fund will change on an annual basis with the asset allocation becoming more conservative as the fund nears the target retirement date. The principal value of the fund(s) is not guaranteed at any time, including at the target date.

	*TDFs may suffer investment losses, including near and following retirement. There is no guarantee that a TDF will provide adequate retirement income.
	 

1 PLANADVISER magazine 2016 Retirement Plan Advisor Survey.

2 Morningstar, Inc. Trailing 5-Year period. Based on rankings for the R6 share class of each fund versus their relevant Morningstar target date category as of 12/31/16. Different share classes may have different rankings.

3 Chatham Partners Satisfaction Survey, 2015 J.P. Morgan Asset Management is the marketing name for the asset management business of JPMorgan Chase & Co., and its affiliates worldwide.

	Contact JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc. at 1-800-480-4111 for a prospectus. Carefully consider the fund's objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the mutual fund before investing. The prospectus contains this and other fund information. Read it carefully before investing.

	J.P. Morgan Funds are distributed by JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc., which is an affiliate of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Affiliates of JPMorgan Chase & Co. receive fees for providing various services to the funds. JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc. is a member of FINRA/SIPC.
















 













 







Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (Offshore) Ltd. - Pooled Investment Fund- Ellis  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (Offshore) Ltd.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    One Manhattanville Road Suite 201 
    Purchase, NY, 10577Phone: 914-694-8000 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-12-22


Amended


$34,599,600


$34,599,600


Equity Only


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2015-12-22


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Equity Only


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Sam Ellis 
 Director 


 Joseph D. Glatt 
 Executive 


 Tammy Jennissen 
 Director 






































FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced | Apollo Asset Management | Fund factsheets | FE Trustnet


















 

















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table











Home

»


Apollo Asset Management

»

FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced



FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced






Change Share Class?


FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D GBP

FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced A Acc GBP
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced A Inc GBP
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced B GBP
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced C GBP
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D EUR
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D USD
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced F GBP
FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced H GBP



Select Performance Currency


Pound Sterling

Fund's Currency









Buy Fund
Add to Basket 
Factsheet PDF 
Group Factsheet
Classic Factsheet





More





 Close
Key Information


What is the Fund’s objective?
How has this fund performed?
Ratios and analysis
Prices
What does this fund invest in?
News and research about this fund
Contact Details




Options
Show group factsheets
Download factsheet PDF









Next steps
Buy this fund via Trustnet Direct
Add to Basket
Follow this fund on









Fund Centre
Performance
Dividends
Breakdown
Life & Pension Mirrors

                    History












            What is the Fund’s objective?


        The fund seeks to achieve a positive return over the medium to longer term, which is above normal cash deposit rates.
    




How does FE rate this fund?





No FE Alpha managers









Not included in the AFI







Learn more about ratings 
Compare funds using ratings







Who manages this fund?









 Craig Wetton Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Craig joined Chase de Vere in 1986 as an independent financial advisor. In 1995, he founded Chartwell Investment...

                                    Co-manager








 Ian Willings Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Ian started his investment career in June 2000 as an investment analyst for RP Hodson (Asset Management). In July 2001...

                                    Co-manager








 Steve Brann Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Steve moved from UBS in 1987 to manage the £3bn Lucas Industries Pension Fund which was ranked consistently in the top...

                                    Co-manager





Show all

Learn more about fund managers
Compare fund managers







Literature & Downloads




Provider's own Factsheet
Long Reports - Final
Manager's Report - Final
Prospectus
Manager's Report - Interim
Long Reports - Interim
Simplified Prospectus




News and research related to this fund







Close X


                Current Managers:






 Craig Wetton
Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Craig joined Chase de Vere in 1986 as an independent financial advisor. In 1995, he founded Chartwell Investment Management and Chartwell Asset Management, and as CEO...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet






 Ian Willings
Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Ian started his investment career in June 2000 as an investment analyst for RP Hodson (Asset Management). In July 2001 he moved to London to become a retail analyst with...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet






 Steve Brann
Since 26-Nov-2008

                            Steve moved from UBS in 1987 to manage the £3bn Lucas Industries Pension Fund which was ranked consistently in the top quartile for performance over 5 years. In 1994, he...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet



                Previous Managers:

Ryan HughesSince 14-Oct-2013 to
                    21-Sep-2016
Tom McGrathSince 27-Nov-2008 to
                    30-Apr-2013











                        How has this fund performed?





Cumulative Performance chart










                                        3 Months

                                        6 Months

                                        1 Year

                                        3 Years

                                        5 Years





Cumulative Performance as at 25/07/2017



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    3m
                                

                                    6m
                                

                                    1yr
                                

                                    3yrs
                                

                                    5yrs
                                






FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D GBP


                                    +2.1
                                

                                   +6.6
                                

                                    +15.5
                                

                                   +20.1
                                

                                   +34.7
                                






Top performing funds


Create a custom chart of this fund's performance






Discrete Performance chart












 



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    0- 12m
                                

                                    12m- 24m
                                

                                    24m- 36m
                                

                                    36m- 48m
                                

                                    48m- 60m
                                






FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D GBP


                                     +15.5
                                

                                   -3.8
                                

                                     +8.0
                                

                                      +1.1
                                

                                     +11.0
                                






Check how your portfolios are currently performing


More performance charts













Forensic News Alerts




Forensic News Alerts





Get Fundswire alerts emailed to you











Ratios and Analysis




                            Ratio Info





                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    1y
                                

                                    3y
                                



?


                                    Volatility
                                

                                   4.44
                                

                                    6.63
                                



?


                                    Alpha
                                

                                      8.02
                                

                                    -0.64
                                



?


                                    Beta
                                

                                      0.70
                                

                                     0.91
                                



?


                                    Sharpe
                                

                               3.39
                                

                                   0.39
                                



?


                                    Info Ratio
                                

                                    1.40
                                

                                     -0.34
                                



?


                                    R2


                                    0.76
                                

                                    0.66
                                











                            Risk Score



                            FE Risk scores allow you to see how risky a fund is in comparison with the FTSE
                            100.




                                This fund:
                            

49




                                FTSE 100:
                            

100




                                Cash:
                            

0





Learn about FE Risk Scores






                            Investment Details





Charges 





                                    Initial
                                

                                    2.00%
                                



                                   Annual
                                

                                    1.00%
                                



?


                                    OCF
                                

                                     2.02%
                                



?


                                    Performance Fee
                                

                                0
                                  
                                 





                                    Minimum Investment?




                                    Initial
                                

                                    £ 1,000
                                



                                    Additional
                                

                                    £ 500
                                















Prices





                                     
                                

                                    Unit type
                                

                                    Currency
                                

                                    Bid
                                

                                    Offer
                                

                                    Date
                                

                                    Yield
                                

                                    Citicode
                                

                                    SEDOL
                                

                                    ISIN
                                



                                    FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D GBP
                                

                                    ACC
                                

                                    GBX
                                

                                    171.05
                                

                                    25 Jul 2017
                                

                                    0.00
                                

                                    DVW4
                                

                                    B3FPF27
                                

                                    GB00B3FPF276
                                




Change the share class at the top of the page to see details of other share classes for this fund.









                        What does this fund invest in?




Asset Class Breakdown (31 May 2017)  






                                        Rank
                                    



                                        Asset 
                                    

                                        %  
                                    

                                         
                                    



                                        1
                                    




                                        International Equities
                                    

                                        41.25
                                    







                                        2
                                    




                                        Alternative Assets
                                    

                                        24.38
                                    



                                        3
                                    




                                        Property
                                    

                                        15.74
                                    



                                        4
                                    




                                        Global Fixed Interest
                                    

                                        9.24
                                    



                                        5
                                    




                                        Money Market
                                    

                                        6.23
                                    



                                        6
                                    




                                        Commodity & Energy
                                    

                                        3.16
                                    




























View Region and Sector breakdowns for this fund






Top Holdings (31 May 2017)






                                    Rank
                                

                                    Largest Holdings
                                

                                    %  
                                



                                    1
                                

SOCGEN GLOBAL AUTOCALL 19%


                                    7.42
                                



                                    2
                                

MACAU PROPERTY


                                    6.87
                                



                                    3
                                

HENDERSON UK ABSOLUTE RETURN


                                    5.70
                                



                                    4
                                

HERMES ASIA EX JAPAN FUND


                                    5.50
                                



                                    5
                                

CREDIT SUISSE GLOBAL AUTOCALL 21.25%


                                    5.33
                                



                                    6
                                

APOLLO ENHANCED ABSOLUTE RETURN


                                    5.30
                                



                                    7
                                

KAMES PROPERTY INCOME


                                    5.19
                                



                                    8
                                

GAM STAR CONTINENTAL EUROPEAN


                                    5.11
                                



                                    9
                                

GAM STAR CREDIT OPPORTUNITIES


                                    4.90
                                



                                    10
                                

POLAR CAPITAL GLOBAL TECHNOLOGY


                                    4.76
                                




More History













                        Additional Information




Additional Information






Legal Structure:


                                       OEIC
                                    



Own ISA wrapper:


                                        YES
                                          
                                            






Trustee / Depositary:


                                        Northern Trust Global Services Limited
                                    



Registrar:


                                        International Financial Data Services Limited
                                    



Multi-Manager:


                                       Unfettered Fund of Funds
                                    







Dividend policy:


 Jan 01 (Final)




Fund size:


                                        £25.4m / $33.1m (31-May-17)
                                    



Unit Launch:


                                        27-Nov-2008
                                    



Fund Launch:


                                        26-Nov-2008
                                    







Savings plan:


                                        Minimum: £ 100.0 Monthly
                                    



Pricing times:


                                       12:00 daily
                                    



Dealing times:


                                         N/A
                                    



Dealing frequency:


                                       Daily
                                    









Other users also looked at










Related Funds




Funds with the same manager (Craig Wetton)
Funds with the same manager (Ian Willings)
Funds with the same manager (Steve Brann)
Funds in this Sector (IA Unclassified)
Funds in the same Region (Global)
Funds in the same Asset Class (Mixed Asset)














                        News and Research about this fund




Relevant articles





View all articles





Relevant Guides















Contact Details




 Cedar House, 3 Cedar park, Cobham Road, Wimborne, BH21 75B
                               


















Close X


                Historical FE Risk Score:




  FP Apollo Multi Asset Balanced D GBP

  FE
                Risk Score 49.00


Learn more about FE Risk Scores
View all FE Risk Scores



Annual Management Charges:  ;



            
        All prices in Pence Sterling (GBX) unless otherwise specified. Price total return performance figures are calculated on a bid price to bid price basis (mid to mid for OEICs) with net income (dividends) reinvested. Performance figures are shown in Pound Sterling (GBP). You can switch the fund’s native currency using the currency selector towards the top of this page.
               
            





        Your custom layout changed and saved automatically

        Drag and drop the icon to customise your factsheet
        layout


Close X


                Email Friend:



                        Email Address:



                        Comment:



                         

                            Ok

                                Cancel





CLOSE


You are being transferred to Trustnet Direct, which is run by Financial Express Investments Limited (authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority), where you will be able to complete this transaction. Trustnet Direct is an execution-only service and does not provide advice on the suitability of investments. You should seek independent financial advice if you are unsure.
Proceed to Trustnet Direct








Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com






























Apollo Asset Management Profile | FE Trustnet

















 



















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table














				Toolset

Portfolio
Multi-plotcharting
Fund ratings 
Top quartiles
Sector  performance
Indices
FE Adviser
					                fund index
WhiteLabel
					                factsheets
KIIDs 
					            download
Exchange
					                rates



















Fund Performance

IA Unit Trusts & OEICsEquity Price & PerformanceInvestment TrustsPension FundsLife FundsOffshore FundsETFsVenture Capital Trusts
















	                    You are here: 
				        

FE Trustnet


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs


Group Factsheet











Investments


Group factsheet / Apollo Asset Management

Apollo Asset Management









 RSS Feed





Group overview
Group Performance




























3 Funds Managed


RankFundFocus 

1FP Apollo Multi Asset AdventurousMixed Asset

2FP Apollo Multi Asset BalancedMixed Asset

3FP Apollo Multi Asset CautiousMixed Asset














 








						Group details
					

						Fund types managed
					


 

						Apollo Asset Management
						Apollo Asset Management funds do not subscribe to FE Trustnet.
Click here if you would like to see more details on this group on FE Trustnet, including fund factsheets.







 IA Unit Trusts & OEICs




 Unit Trusts & OEICs
											

























Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 














                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our 
                    Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
            
        

















ISDA - International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.































 | 0 

Log In

|
Create Account







ISDA®
Safe, Efficient Markets
                











Home

Functional Areas



Legal & Documentation





Recent Documents

Traditional Adherence Protocols

Opinions

Amicus Briefs

Determinations Committees






Public Policy



United States

Europe



Financial Law Reform








Risk Management



Risk Management














Market Infrastructure and Technology



Credit Derivatives

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates

Commodity Derivatives

Collateral

G20 Objectives






Research



Surveys

Studies

Research Notes






ISDA WGMR Implementation

Accounting & Tax

Symbology

Protocol Management

Data, Reporting and FpML






Asset Classes



Credit Derivatives /   Credit Default Swaps

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates Derivatives

FX Derivatives

Energy, Commodities, Developing Products

Structured Products and Other






Regions



Asia-Pacific

Canada

CEE/SEE/CIS, Middle East, Africa

Europe

Japan

Latin America

United States






Committees



Legal

Global Policy

Capital, Risk, Margin and Collateral

Market Infrastructure and Technology (MIT)

Clearing

Data

Trading

ISDA Non-Cleared Margin Initiative

Determinations Committees

IIGC






Conferences



Conference Schedule

Accreditation

ISDA On Demand

ISDA AGM






Newsroom



Press Releases

Webcasts & Videos

Speeches & Testimonies

derivatiViews

media.comment

CommodityFACT.org

ISDA dailyLead

ISDA In Review

Media  Contacts

IQ: ISDA Quarterly






Bookstore



Bookstore

My Online Library






Membership



Member Types

Member Benefits

Application

ISDA Members






About



About ISDA

Board of Directors

Executives

Mission Statement

ISDA By-Laws

Member Competition Policy

ISDA Overview

Contact Us


















Home

Functional Areas

Protocol Management

ISDA August 2012 DF Protocol

Adhering Parties
















Legal & Documentation

Opinions


Determinations Committees


Standard Terms


Disclosures


Amicus Briefs


Eurozone Contingency Planning


Russia and Ukraine-related sanctions


Brexit




Public Policy

United States


Europe


Asia-Pacific


Japan


Global


Supporting G20 Objectives


Financial Law Reform


OTC Derivatives Compliance Calendar




Risk Management


Market Infrastructure and Technology 

Market Infrastructure and Technology


Credit Derivatives


Equity Derivatives


Interest Rates


Commodity Derivatives


FX Derivatives


Collateral


Settlements


G20 Objectives


ISDA Industry Governance Committee (IIGC)




Research

Surveys


Studies


Research Notes


Discussion Papers


OTC Derivatives Data Sources




ISDA WGMR Implementation Initiative

ISDA Webcast: Preparing for WGMR Implementation 


ISDA 2016 Variation Margin Protocol 


ISDA SIMM Licensed Vendors


ISDA Regulatory Margin Self-Disclosure Letter 


Videos: Preparing for the Variation Margin Rules




Accounting & Tax

International Financial Reporting Standards


US Generally Accepted Accounting Principles


National and International Tax Issues


FATCA




Symbology


Protocol Management

About ISDA Protocols


Open Protocols


Submit Adherence Letter


My Protocol Orders


Traditional Adherence Protocols


Closed Protocols


ISDA Standard Adherence & Refund Policy




Data, Reporting and FpML

Data and Reporting


Clearing Connectivity Standard (CCS)


FpML










Adhering Parties

Adhere to this Protocol

Protocol Name: ISDA August 2012 DF Protocol
Last Updated: July 25, 2017
Number of Parties: 20246





*
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



Download protocol data



						#
						ParticipantMethod 1Method 2Method 3Method 4Last SubmissionAcceptance Date
1001
Amundi Absolute Return Canyon Fund Public Limited Company

November 25, 2016November 25, 2016
1002
Amundi Absolute Return Complus Fund Public Limited Company - Amundi Absolute Return Complus Asia Macro Fund

November 25, 2016November 25, 2016
1003
Amundi Absolute Return Frontfour Fund Public Limited Company

November 25, 2016November 25, 2016
1004
Amundi Absolute Return III Fund Public Limited Company

November 25, 2016November 25, 2016
1005
Amundi Alternative Investments Ireland Limitd

December 20, 2012December 20, 2012
1006
Amundi Alternative Invetsments SAS

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1007
Amundi Investments USA, LLC

December 14, 2012December 17, 2012
1008
AmWINS Group, Inc.

March 08, 2017March 08, 2017
1009
AMX LLC

April 24, 2013April 25, 2013
1010
AMX LLC

April 10, 2015April 10, 2015
1011
AMX MASTER - WADHWANI - KEYNES MULTI ASSET VALUE

March 22, 2017March 23, 2017
1012
AMX Master – Graticule – Volatility Trigger 

April 20, 2017April 20, 2017
1013
AMX UK LIMITED

September 13, 2013September 13, 2013
1014
AMX UK Limited

April 10, 2015April 10, 2015
1015
Anadarko Minerals, Inc.

April 29, 2013April 29, 2013
1016
Anadarko Petroleum Corporation

October 17, 2012October 17, 2012
1017
Analog Devices, Inc.

December 10, 2012December 10, 2012
1018
Analogic Canada Corporation

July 31, 2013August 01, 2013
1019
Analytic Investors LLC

July 08, 2013July 08, 2013
1020
Analytical FX Trading Strategy Series LLC

April 16, 2013April 17, 2013
1021
Anandar Event Opportunities Master Fund Ltd.

May 28, 2014May 28, 2014
1022
ANBAKAM MEATLS LLC

June 05, 2013June 05, 2013
1023
Ancestry.com Inc.

March 21, 2013March 21, 2013
1024
Anchor Bank, National Association

April 02, 2013April 02, 2013
1025
Anchor Glass Container Corporation

January 27, 2017January 30, 2017
1026
Anchorage Capital Master Offshore, Ltd.

September 18, 2012September 18, 2012
1027
Anchorage Illiquid Opportunities Offshore Master II, L.P.

September 18, 2012September 18, 2012
1028
Anchorage Illiquid Opportunities Offshore Master III, L.P.

September 18, 2012September 18, 2012
1029
Anchorage Illiquid Opportunities Offshore Master IV, L.P.

January 14, 2014January 14, 2014
1030
Anchorage Illiquid Opportunities Offshore Master V, L.P.

January 04, 2016January 04, 2016
1031
Anchorage Illiquid Opportunities Offshore Master, L.P.

September 18, 2012September 18, 2012
1032
Anchorage LPC-S, L.P.

January 31, 2017January 31, 2017
1033
Anchorage LPC-V, L.P.

January 31, 2017January 31, 2017
1034
Anchorage MSW Structured Credit Master, L.P.

May 28, 2013May 28, 2013
1035
Anchorage Short Credit Offshore Master Fund, Ltd.

September 18, 2012September 18, 2012
1036
AnchorBank, FSB

July 14, 2014July 14, 2014
1037
Ancient Art, L.P.

December 11, 2012December 11, 2012
1038
Andalusian Capital Partners, LP

December 06, 2012December 07, 2012
1039
Anderson Global Macro Master Fund, LP

April 29, 2013April 29, 2013
1040
Andor Opportunity Fund, LP

May 06, 2014May 07, 2014
1041
Andor Opportunity Master Fund, Ltd.

May 06, 2014May 07, 2014
1042
Andre Agassi Foundation for Education

August 22, 2016August 22, 2016
1043
Andreeff Equity Advisors, LLC

April 29, 2013April 29, 2013
1044
Andrew LLC

November 14, 2012November 14, 2012
1045
Andrews Distributing Company of North Texas, LLC

December 10, 2012December 10, 2012
1046
Andrews Fried LLC

October 23, 2015October 23, 2015
1047
Andritz Iggesund Tools Inc.

December 03, 2014December 03, 2014
1048
Andritz Inc.

May 01, 2014May 01, 2014
1049
Andritz Metals Inc.

August 25, 2014August 25, 2014
1050
Andritz Separation Inc.

May 21, 2014May 21, 2014
1051
Andritz(USA) Inc.

September 24, 2013September 25, 2013
1052
Angel Island Partners, LLC

July 29, 2013July 29, 2013
1053
Angel Oak Capital Advisors, LLC

November 01, 2013November 01, 2013
1054
Angelo, Gordon & Co., L.P.

November 30, 2012December 03, 2012
1055
Angelo, Gordon & Co., L.P.

December 18, 2012December 18, 2012
1056
Anglesea Funding Plc

May 21, 2014May 21, 2014
1057
Anglican Long Service Leave Fund Limited

July 21, 2016July 21, 2016
1058
Anheuser-Busch Companies, LLC

December 05, 2012December 06, 2012
1059
ANHEUSER-BUSCH INBEV WORLDWIDE INC.

July 28, 2016July 28, 2016
1060
ANI Printing Inks B.V.

October 17, 2014October 17, 2014
1061
Anicca Capital Management LP

October 02, 2014October 02, 2014
1062
Anil K Jain Trust

September 14, 2016September 14, 2016
1063
ANKOR E&P Holdings Corportion

June 12, 2013June 12, 2013
1064
Annaly Capital Management, Inc.

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1065
Annaly Funding LLC

February 11, 2015February 11, 2015
1066
Annaly Funding TRS LLC

April 14, 2014April 14, 2014
1067
Annapurna Productions, LLC

March 03, 2016March 04, 2016
1068
Anne Arundel Health Care Services, Inc.

February 24, 2016February 24, 2016
1069
Anne Arundel Health System, Inc.

February 24, 2016February 24, 2016
1070
Anne Arundel Medical Center, Inc.

February 24, 2016February 24, 2016
1071
Annuity Investors Life Insurance Company

November 20, 2012November 20, 2012
1072
ANRP TXU (UBS), L.P.

May 14, 2013May 14, 2013
1073
ANS Europe (Lux) S.a.r.l.

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
1074
ANS Europe Structured Finance (Lux) S.a r.l.

February 06, 2014February 06, 2014
1075
ANS Europe, L.P.

December 20, 2013December 20, 2013
1076
Ansam Metals Corporation

April 23, 2013April 23, 2013
1077
Anschutz Family Investment Company LLC

April 05, 2013April 05, 2013
1078
Anschutz Investment Company

April 05, 2013April 08, 2013
1079
Ansell Limited

March 25, 2015March 26, 2015
1080
Answers Corporation

November 04, 2014November 05, 2014
1081
Antares Capital Partners Ltd

January 08, 2014January 09, 2014
1082
Antero Energy Partners LLC

August 25, 2014August 25, 2014
1083
Antero Resources Appalachian Corporation

November 30, 2012December 03, 2012
1084
Anthion Management LLC

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1085
Anthony Faillace, Drake Private Investments LLC

November 19, 2012November 19, 2012
1086
Anthracite CDO II, Ltd.

August 28, 2013August 29, 2013
1087
Anticimex International AB

August 23, 2016August 23, 2016
1088
Anticimex Pty Ltd

August 23, 2016August 23, 2016
1089
Antipodean Advisors LLC

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1090
Antipodes Partners Limited

October 31, 2016October 31, 2016
1091
Anworth Mortgage Asset Corporation

December 18, 2012December 18, 2012
1092
ANZ Bank New Zealand Limited

November 28, 2012November 29, 2012
1093
AO Asset Management, LLC

July 09, 2014July 09, 2014
1094
AOC Technologies (Wuhan) Co. Ltd.

August 06, 2015August 07, 2015
1095
AOD Holdings, LLC

December 03, 2012December 03, 2012
1096
Aon Corporation

December 13, 2012December 14, 2012
1097
Aon Hewitt Group Trust - High Yield Plus Bond FundAon Hewitt Group Trust - High Yield Plus Bond Fund

April 07, 2014April 07, 2014
1098
Aon Hewitt Investment Consulting, Inc.

November 13, 2015November 16, 2015
1099
Aon Pension Plan Trust

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1100
Aon PLC

December 13, 2012December 14, 2012
1101
Aon UK Limited

December 13, 2012December 14, 2012
1102
Aozora Bank, Ltd.

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1103
Aozora Trust Bank, Ltd. acting as trustee for various Trust Funds and accounts

February 06, 2014February 07, 2014
1104
AP Investment Europe III, LP

July 09, 2014July 09, 2014
1105
AP NewMountainTopper Counterparty, C.V.

April 14, 2014April 14, 2014
1106
AP NewMountainTopper Holdco C.V.

July 28, 2014July 29, 2014
1107
AP NMT Acquisition B.V. 

August 06, 2014August 07, 2014
1108
AP VII TXU (CS), L.P.

May 14, 2013May 14, 2013
1109
AP VII TXU (UBS), L.P.

May 14, 2013May 14, 2013
1110
APAC Customer Services, Inc.

April 04, 2013April 05, 2013
1111
Apache Nitrogen Products, Inc.

February 27, 2014February 27, 2014
1112
Apex Capital, LLC

December 03, 2012December 03, 2012
1113
Apex Cayman Fund Limited

January 10, 2013January 10, 2013
1114
Apex Cayman Fund Limited

December 21, 2012December 21, 2012
1115
Apex Louisville, LLC

October 14, 2014October 14, 2014
1116
Apex Oil Company, Inc.

September 18, 2013September 18, 2013
1117
Apex Tool Group, LLC

December 03, 2015December 04, 2015
1118
APG Asset Management N.V. (merged with APG Investment Services NV)

May 19, 2014May 19, 2014
1119
APG Treasury Center B.V.

November 13, 2012November 13, 2012
1120
APi Group, Inc.

August 05, 2014August 05, 2014
1121
Apis Capital Advisors, LLC

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1122
APLP Holdings Limited Partnership

April 05, 2016April 05, 2016
1123
Apollo 17, LLC

September 22, 2016September 23, 2016
1124
Apollo A-N Credit Fund (Delaware), L.P.

March 27, 2015March 30, 2015
1125
Apollo Accord Master Fund, L.P.

November 22, 2016November 22, 2016
1126
Apollo Alternative Credit Absolute Return Fund L.P.

January 05, 2015January 05, 2015
1127
Apollo Alternative Credit Long Short Fund L.P.

January 05, 2015January 05, 2015
1128
Apollo Asia Private Credit Fund, L.P.

July 09, 2014July 09, 2014
1129
Apollo Asia Private Credit Master Fund Pte. Ltd

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1130
Apollo Asia Real Estate Fund, L.P.

May 04, 2016May 04, 2016
1131
Apollo Atlas Master Fund, LLC

March 13, 2017March 13, 2017
1132
Apollo Aviation Fund Management, LLC

June 12, 2015June 15, 2015
1133
Apollo Aviation Management Limited

June 12, 2015June 15, 2015
1134
Apollo Capital Efficient Management, LLC

September 26, 2016September 26, 2016
1135
Apollo Capital Spectrum Fund, L.P.

November 05, 2013November 05, 2013
1136
Apollo Centre Street Partnership, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1137
Apollo Centre Street Structured Finance, L.P.

February 06, 2014February 06, 2014
1138
Apollo Credit Allocation Fund II

June 08, 2017June 08, 2017
1139
Apollo Credit Allocation Fund II 

July 24, 2017July 24, 2017
1140
Apollo Credit Funds ICAV - ACE Credit Allocation Fund I

July 24, 2017July 24, 2017
1141
Apollo Credit Liquidity TRS III, LLC

July 11, 2013July 11, 2013
1142
Apollo Credit Master Fund Ltd

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1143
Apollo Credit NS Holdings (Lux) Sarl

July 08, 2014July 09, 2014
1144
Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund III AIV I LP

December 10, 2014December 10, 2014
1145
Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund III LP

July 29, 2013July 29, 2013
1146
Apollo Credit Opportunity Trading Fund III

December 10, 2014December 10, 2014
1147
Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund, L.P.

October 28, 2013October 29, 2013
1148
Apollo Credit Strategies Master Fund Ltd.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1149
Apollo Education Group, Inc. formerly known as Apollo Group, Inc.

February 12, 2014February 13, 2014
1150
Apollo Emerging Markets Absolute Return (Lux) S.a.r.l.

June 19, 2014June 19, 2014
1151
Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Master Fund LP

September 17, 2015September 17, 2015
1152
Apollo Emerging Markets Fixed Income Strategies Fund, L.P.

October 28, 2014October 29, 2014
1153
Apollo Energy Opportunity Fund LP

March 25, 2015March 26, 2015
1154
APOLLO EPF MANAGEMENT LP

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1155
Apollo European Credit Master Fund, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1156
Apollo European Financials Credit Fund, L.P.

July 28, 2015July 28, 2015
1157
Apollo European Long Short Fund, L.P.

November 03, 2014November 03, 2014
1158
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund II (Dollar A), L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1159
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund II (Master Dollar B), L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1160
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund III (Dollar A), L.P. 

March 29, 2017March 29, 2017
1161
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund III (Dollar B), L.P.

March 29, 2017March 29, 2017
1162
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund III (Euro B), L.P.

March 29, 2017March 29, 2017
1163
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund III (Master Dollar B), L.P.

March 30, 2017March 30, 2017
1164
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund III (Master Euro B), L.P.

March 30, 2017March 30, 2017
1165
Apollo European Principal Finance Fund, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1166
Apollo European Strategic Investments (Holdings), L.P.

May 13, 2013May 14, 2013
1167
Apollo Franklin Partnership, L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
1168
Apollo Fund VI BC, L.P.

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
1169
Apollo Helius Loan Fund 

July 24, 2017July 24, 2017
1170
Apollo Helius Multi-Credit Fund I 

July 24, 2017July 24, 2017
1171
Apollo Hercules (Lux) S.a r.l.

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1172
Apollo Hercules Partners, L.P.

August 27, 2015August 27, 2015
1173
APOLLO INVESTMENT CORPORATION

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1174
Apollo Investment Europe III (Lux) SARL

July 02, 2014July 03, 2014
1175
Apollo Kings Alley Credit Fund Management, LLC 

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1176
Apollo Kings Alley Credit Fund, L.P.

March 24, 2016March 24, 2016
1177
Apollo Lincoln Fixed Income Fund, L.P.

May 21, 2014May 22, 2014
1178
Apollo Lincoln Private Credit Fund, L.P.

May 21, 2014May 22, 2014
1179
Apollo Management Holdings, L.P.

May 22, 2014May 23, 2014
1180
Apollo Moultrie Credit Fund, L.P. 

January 04, 2016January 04, 2016
1181
Apollo Palmetto Strategic Partnership, L.P.

July 14, 2017July 14, 2017
1182
Apollo Principal Holdings VII, L.P.

July 01, 2016July 01, 2016
1183
Apollo SK Strategic Investments, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1184
Apollo Special Opportunities Managed Account, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1185
Apollo SPN Investments I (Credit), LLC

May 29, 2013May 29, 2013
1186
Apollo Strategic Value Master Fund, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1187
Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Master Fund II Ltd.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1188
Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Master Fund III LP

February 28, 2014February 28, 2014
1189
Apollo Tactical Value SPN Investments, L.P.

September 25, 2015September 28, 2015
1190
Apollo Thunder Partners, L.P.

February 11, 2016February 11, 2016
1191
Apollo Total Return Management LLC

August 26, 2014August 26, 2014
1192
Apollo Total Return Master Fund Enhanced LP 

December 21, 2015December 21, 2015
1193
Apollo Total Return Master Fund LP

February 28, 2014February 28, 2014
1194
Apollo Tower Credit Fund, L.P.

December 20, 2016December 20, 2016
1195
Apollo TR Commercial Real Estate Debt LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1196
Apollo TR Emerging Markets (Can.) LP 

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1197
Apollo TR Emerging Markets (Lux) S.à r.l. 

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1198
Apollo TR Emerging Markets Holdings Ltd.

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1199
Apollo TR Enhanced Alpha Credit LLC

December 21, 2015December 21, 2015
1200
Apollo TR Enhanced Levered Yield LLC 

December 21, 2015December 21, 2015
1201
Apollo TR European Broadly Syndicated Loan Holdings Ltd.

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1202
Apollo TR European High Yield Bond Holdings Ltd.

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1203
Apollo TR Infrastructure LLC 

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1204
Apollo TR Insurance Linked Securities LLC 

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1205
Apollo TR Mortgage RMBS LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1206
Apollo TR Mortgage RMBS LLC

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1207
Apollo TR Opportunistic Ltd.

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1208
Apollo TR Residential Real Estate Debt LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1209
Apollo TR Structured Credit LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1210
Apollo TR Student Loans LLC

September 07, 2016September 08, 2016
1211
Apollo TR Taxable Municipals LLC 

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1212
Apollo TR US Broadly Syndicated Loan LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1213
Apollo TR US High Yield Bond LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1214
Apollo TR US Middle Market Loan LLC

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1215
Apollo TRF European Financials L.P.

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
1216
Apollo TRF European Financials, L.P.

August 28, 2015August 28, 2015
1217
Apollo U.S. Real Estate Fund II L.P.

August 27, 2015August 27, 2015
1218
Apollo Union Street Partners, L.P.

September 25, 2015September 28, 2015
1219
Apollo Value Investment Master Fund, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1220
Apollo Value Management, L.P.

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1221
Apollo Zeus (Lux) S.a r.l.

February 06, 2014February 06, 2014
1222
Apollo Zeus (Lux) S.a.r.l.

December 20, 2013December 20, 2013
1223
Apollo Zeus Strategic Investments, L.P.

December 03, 2013December 03, 2013
1224
Apollo/Palmetto Loan Portfolio, L.P.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1225
Appaloosa LP

November 13, 2015November 16, 2015
1226
Appaloosa Management LP

December 06, 2012December 06, 2012
1227
Apple Bank for Savings

September 28, 2012September 28, 2012
1228
Apple Inc

March 21, 2013March 21, 2013
1229
Applied Biosystems B.V. (Singapore Branch)

December 14, 2012December 14, 2012
1230
Applied Biosystems Finance BV

December 14, 2012December 14, 2012
1231
Applied Biosystems LLC

December 13, 2012December 14, 2012
1232
Applied Industrial Technologies, Inc.

April 23, 2013April 24, 2013
1233
Applied Materials, Inc.

December 18, 2012December 18, 2012
1234
Applied Systems, Inc.

January 14, 2014January 14, 2014
1235
Appnexus Inc.

November 17, 2016November 17, 2016
1236
Approach Resources Inc.

December 11, 2012December 11, 2012
1237
April Futures, LLC

April 19, 2013April 19, 2013
1238
APRILGRANGE LIMITED

April 15, 2013April 16, 2013
1239
Apro, LLC

July 01, 2014July 01, 2014
1240
APSCO FOR PETROLEUM SERVICES LLC

February 26, 2013February 26, 2013
1241
Aptalis Pharma Inc.

September 26, 2013September 26, 2013
1242
AptarGroup Inc.

December 04, 2012December 04, 2012
1243
AptarGroup UK Holdings Limited

February 01, 2017February 01, 2017
1244
APX Group Inc

June 22, 2016June 22, 2016
1245
AqGen Ascensus, Inc.

April 13, 2017April 13, 2017
1246
AQR Capital Management, LLC

October 19, 2012October 19, 2012
1247
AQUA LUNG AMERICA

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1248
Aquarion Holdings LLC

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1249
Aquiline Financial Services Fund II L.P.

October 14, 2013October 15, 2013
1250
Aquiline Financial Services Fund III L.P.,

June 01, 2016June 01, 2016
1251
AR-Enclave, LLC

March 28, 2014March 28, 2014
1252
Arab Bank Plc.

September 29, 2015September 29, 2015
1253
Aramark Canada Ltd.

October 07, 2015October 08, 2015
1254
ARAMARK Corporation

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1255
Ararat Capital Management, LP

June 23, 2016June 23, 2016
1256
Aravt Global LLC

November 22, 2013November 22, 2013
1257
Arbalet Capital Management, LP

April 26, 2013April 26, 2013
1258
Arbor Place Biloxi LLC

May 06, 2014May 06, 2014
1259
Arbor Realty Funding, LLC

May 03, 2013May 03, 2013
1260
Arbor Realty SR, Inc.

May 03, 2013May 03, 2013
1261
Arbor Trace, LLC

December 11, 2014December 11, 2014
1262
Arbor Village LLP

September 26, 2013September 26, 2013
1263
ArborAmerica, Inc

May 05, 2014May 05, 2014
1264
Arbour CLO III Limited

February 16, 2016February 16, 2016
1265
Arbour CLO IV Designated Activity Company

November 10, 2016November 10, 2016
1266
Arbour CLO Limited

March 12, 2014March 12, 2014
1267
ARC Global Holdco LLC By: Global Net Lease Operating Partnership, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, its sole member

July 11, 2017July 11, 2017
1268
ARC Properties Operating Partnership, L.P.

October 21, 2014October 21, 2014
1269
ARC Resources Ltd.

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1270
Arcadia Hub Holdings 3, LLC

April 18, 2017April 19, 2017
1271
Arcadia Resources, L.P.

July 09, 2013July 09, 2013
1272
Arcadia Resources, LP

November 27, 2012November 27, 2012
1273
Arcem Master Fund L.P.

March 20, 2013March 20, 2013
1274
ARCH AUTO PARTS HOLDING COMPANY INC.

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
1275
Arch Capital Investors, LP

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1276
Arch Coal, Inc.

October 10, 2012October 10, 2012
1277
Arch Energy Resources, LLC

October 10, 2012October 10, 2012
1278
Arch Energy Resources, LLC

August 27, 2015August 27, 2015
1279
Arch Reinsurance Ltd.

April 08, 2014April 08, 2014
1280
Archegos Fund, LLC

May 29, 2014May 29, 2014
1281
Archegos Fund, LP formerly known as Tiger Asia Fund, LP

May 29, 2014May 29, 2014
1282
Archegos Overseas Fund, Ltd. formerly known as Tiger Asia Overseas Fund, Ltd.

May 29, 2014May 29, 2014
1283
Archer Capital Management, L.P.

April 29, 2013April 29, 2013
1284
Archer-Daniels-Midland Co

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1285
Archetype Mortgage Funding I LLC

April 08, 2013April 09, 2013
1286
Archetype Mortgage Funding II LLC

April 08, 2013April 09, 2013
1287
Archstone Offshore Fund, Ltd.

December 20, 2012December 20, 2012
1288
Archview Investment Group LP

November 14, 2012November 14, 2012
1289
ARCIM Advisors, LLC

December 21, 2012December 21, 2012
1290
ARCIM Commodity Master Fund, Ltd.

April 24, 2013April 24, 2013
1291
ARCIM Equity Partners, LP

April 30, 2013April 30, 2013
1292
Arcos Dorados Argentina S.A.

June 19, 2017June 20, 2017
1293
Arcos Dorados BV

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
1294
Arcos Dorados Holdings Inc.

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
1295
Arctic Cat Inc

March 31, 2014March 31, 2014
1296
Arctic Glacier U.S.A., Inc.

March 20, 2017March 20, 2017
1297
Arda Capital Management LLC

June 04, 2013June 05, 2013
1298
Ardea Investment Management Pty Ltd

December 17, 2012December 18, 2012
1299
Ardea Investment Management Pty Ltd

July 26, 2016July 27, 2016
1300
Arden Advisers II, L.P.

January 22, 2015January 22, 2015
1301
Arden Alternative Advisers Compass SPC

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1302
Arden Alternative Advisers SPC

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1303
Arden Alternative Advisers Unit Trust

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1304
Arden Alternative Strategies Fund, A Series of Arden Investment Series Trust

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1305
Arden Alternative Strategies II, a Series of Arden Investment Series Trust

October 21, 2013October 21, 2013
1306
Arden ERISA Portable Alpha SPC

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1307
Arden Group, Inc.

October 12, 2015October 13, 2015
1308
Arden Offshore Advisers, Ltd.

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1309
Arden PropPartners Global Macro Unit Trust

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1310
Arden Sage Capital International, Ltd.

December 18, 2012December 19, 2012
1311
Arden Variable Alternative Strategies Fund, a Series of Arden Investment Series Trust

October 21, 2013October 21, 2013
1312
Ardent Leisure US Holding Inc

October 22, 2013October 23, 2013
1313
Ardent Mills, LLC

May 29, 2014May 29, 2014
1314
Ardmore Global Investors, LP

February 25, 2016February 25, 2016
1315
Ardsley Advisory Partners

February 11, 2014February 11, 2014
1316
Ardsley Advisory Partners

February 26, 2014February 26, 2014
1317
Areas USA, INC

December 11, 2012December 11, 2012
1318
AREG PRP Concord Park Holdings LLC

October 06, 2015October 06, 2015
1319
Arena Capital Advisors, LLC

September 11, 2014September 12, 2014
1320
Arena Energy, LP

December 11, 2012December 11, 2012
1321
Arena Energy, LP

December 05, 2014December 05, 2014
1322
Arena Finance Holdings Co., LLC

January 15, 2016January 18, 2016
1323
Arena Finance Markets, LP

December 05, 2016December 05, 2016
1324
Arena Investors, LP

January 15, 2016January 18, 2016
1325
Arena Origination Co., LLC

January 15, 2016January 18, 2016
1326
AREP Hopewell LLC

August 09, 2013August 09, 2013
1327
Ares Commercial Real Estate Management LLC, a Delaware limited liability company

September 09, 2014September 09, 2014
1328
Ares European Real Estate Fund II, L.P.

December 30, 2014December 30, 2014
1329
Ares European Real Estate Fund III, L.P. 

April 07, 2014April 07, 2014
1330
Ares European Real Estate Fund IV, L.P. 

May 23, 2014May 23, 2014
1331
Ares Investment Funds SPC

May 14, 2013May 14, 2013
1332
Ares Investments LLC

December 10, 2012December 11, 2012
1333
Ares Management Limited

August 24, 2016August 25, 2016
1334
Ares Management LLC

November 21, 2012November 22, 2012
1335
Ares Real Estate Management Holdings, LLC

January 02, 2014January 02, 2014
1336
ARFA Enterprises, Inc.

March 04, 2014March 04, 2014
1337
ARG IH Corporation

July 07, 2014July 07, 2014
1338
ARGA  Investment Management, LP

July 15, 2013July 16, 2013
1339
Argent Energy (US) Holdings Inc.

May 09, 2013May 09, 2013
1340
Argent Energy Trust

May 09, 2013May 09, 2013
1341
argent properties,llc

May 29, 2013May 29, 2013
1342
Argentem Creek Partners LP

January 23, 2017January 23, 2017
1343
Argentem Creek Partners LP (Addition of Funds)

April 03, 2017April 03, 2017
1344
Argentiere Capital AG

January 06, 2014January 06, 2014
1345
Argentiere Relative Value Opportunities Master Fund Ltd

January 31, 2017January 31, 2017
1346
Argo Group International Holdings, Ltd.

December 17, 2012December 17, 2012
1347
Argonaut Global Equities Partnership, L.P.

April 16, 2013April 16, 2013
1348
Argonaut Global Macro Fund, LTD

April 15, 2013April 16, 2013
1349
Argonaut Macro Partnership, L.P.

April 15, 2013April 15, 2013
1350
Argonaut Management, L.P.

November 29, 2012November 29, 2012
1351
Argos Global Partner Services, LLC.

February 03, 2014February 03, 2014
1352
ARGOS USA CORP

February 17, 2014February 17, 2014
1353
Argyle Street Management Limited

April 25, 2013April 25, 2013
1354
Argyros Family Trust

March 03, 2017March 03, 2017
1355
Aria Energy Operating LLC

June 17, 2015June 17, 2015
1356
Ariba, Inc.

May 06, 2013May 06, 2013
1357
Aricent Technologies

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1358
Aricent Technologies (Holdings) Limited

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1359
Aricent Technologies Mauritius Limited

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1360
Ariel Financial Company Limited

October 31, 2013October 31, 2013
1361
Ariel Global Equity Fund

April 06, 2013April 08, 2013
1362
Ariel International Equity Fund

April 06, 2013April 08, 2013
1363
Ariel Investments, LLC

March 27, 2013March 27, 2013
1364
Ariel Schachter

December 06, 2012December 06, 2012
1365
Arif N. Bhalwani

December 27, 2012December 28, 2012
1366
Arise Virtual Solutions Inc.

May 12, 2014May 12, 2014
1367
Arista Industries, Inc.

August 21, 2013August 21, 2013
1368
Aristeia Capital, L.L.C.

November 23, 2012November 26, 2012
1369
Aristocrat International Pty Ltd

November 18, 2014November 19, 2014
1370
Aristocrat Technologies Incorporated

July 13, 2017July 13, 2017
1371
Arizon Structures Worldwide, LLC

July 24, 2014July 24, 2014
1372
Arizona Bank & Trust

February 25, 2015February 25, 2015
1373
Arizona Chemical B.V.

December 12, 2012December 12, 2012
1374
Arizona Chemical Company, LLC

December 06, 2012December 06, 2012
1375
Arizona Chemical Finance B.V.

December 06, 2012December 06, 2012
1376
Arjuna Fund Pte. Ltd.

June 06, 2017June 07, 2017
1377
Ark Property Holdings SNC

March 13, 2017March 14, 2017
1378
Arkema Inc.

December 13, 2012December 13, 2012
1379
Arkkan Opportunities Fund Ltd.

September 16, 2015September 16, 2015
1380
Arlington Asset Investment Corp.

July 20, 2015July 21, 2015
1381
Arlington County Employees' Retirement System

February 18, 2015February 19, 2015
1382
Arlington Valley Solar Energy II, LLC

April 23, 2013April 24, 2013
1383
Arloma Corporation

March 26, 2014March 26, 2014
1384
Arlon Group (Europe) S.A.

February 08, 2013February 11, 2013
1385
ARM I QRS, Inc.

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1386
ARM I, LLC

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1387
ARM II, LLC

December 04, 2012December 05, 2012
1388
Armacell Insulation United States Holding Inc

November 12, 2013November 12, 2013
1389
Armada Hoffler, L.P.

July 11, 2013July 11, 2013
1390
Armada Latin America Opportunity Master Fund LTD

July 03, 2013July 04, 2013
1391
Armistice Capital, LLC

July 27, 2016July 27, 2016
1392
Armor Advisors, LLC

December 13, 2012December 14, 2012
1393
Armor Holdings II LLC

May 31, 2013May 31, 2013
1394
Armored Wolf, LLC

November 02, 2012November 02, 2012
1395
ARMOUR Residential REIT, Inc.

December 19, 2012December 19, 2012
1396
Armstrong DLW GmbH

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1397
Armstrong Flooring Pty Ltd

May 04, 2016May 04, 2016
1398
Armstrong Flooring, Inc.

May 04, 2016May 04, 2016
1399
Armstrong Hardwood Flooring Company

May 04, 2016May 04, 2016
1400
Armstrong Metalldecken AG

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1401
Armstrong Wood Products, Inc.

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1402
Armstrong World Industries (Australia) Pty Limited

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1403
Armstrong World Industries Canada Ltd.

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1404
Armstrong World Industries Limited

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1405
Armstrong World Industries LLC

August 14, 2013August 14, 2013
1406
Armstrong World Industries Pty Ltd

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1407
Armstrong World Industries, Inc.

October 18, 2012October 18, 2012
1408
Army and Air Force Exchange Service

May 16, 2013May 16, 2013
1409
Arnott’s Biscuits Limited

February 04, 2015February 04, 2015
1410
Arnott’s New Zealand Limited

February 04, 2015February 04, 2015
1411
Arosa Capital Management LP

December 10, 2013December 10, 2013
1412
ARP Alternative Risk Premia 2X Master Fund Ltd

April 24, 2017April 24, 2017
1413
ARP Alternative Risk Premia Master Fund Ltd

April 27, 2017April 27, 2017
1414
Arqiva Financing No 1 Limited

July 21, 2014July 21, 2014
1415
Arqiva Senior Finance Limited

January 06, 2014January 06, 2014
1416
Arrakasta Master Fund LP 

December 09, 2015December 09, 2015
1417
Arran Isle Holdings Ltd

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
1418
Array Acquisitionco, Corp.

October 29, 2015October 29, 2015
1419
ARRIS Group, Inc.

April 08, 2013April 08, 2013
1420
Arris International plc formerly known as ARRIS International Limited

January 05, 2016January 06, 2016
1421
Arrocorp I, LLC

March 06, 2014March 06, 2014
1422
Arrow Asia Pac Ltd.

March 21, 2013March 21, 2013
1423
Arrow Central Europe Gmbh

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1424
Arrow Components (NZ)

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1425
Arrow Components Sweden AB

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1426
Arrow Denmark ApS

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1427
Arrow ECS Central GmbH

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1428
Arrow ECS doo Croatia

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1429
Arrow ECS Internet Security AG

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1430
Arrow ECS Ltd.

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1431
Arrow Elect Hungary BT

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
1432
Arrow Electonics GMBH & Co Kg

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
1433
Arrow Electronics  Poland Sp Zo.o

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
1434
Arrow Electronics (UK) Ltd

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1435
Arrow Electronics Asia (S) Pte Ltd.

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1436
Arrow Electronics Australia Pty Ltd.

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1437
Arrow Electronics China Ltd.

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1438
Arrow Electronics Czech Republic S.R.O

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
1439
Arrow Electronics EMEASA srl

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
1440
Arrow Electronics Estonia Ou

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1441
Arrow Electronics Inc.

February 05, 2013February 05, 2013
1442
Arrow Electronics Italia S.r.l.

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1443
Arrow Elektronik Ticaret, A.S.

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1444
Arrow Enterprise Computing Solutions Ltd.

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1445
Arrow Finland Oy

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1446
Arrow France SA

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1447
Arrow Iberia Electronica SLU

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1448
Arrow Investment Advisors, LLC

October 08, 2013October 08, 2013
1449
Arrow Nordic Components Ab

November 18, 2013November 18, 2013
1450
Arrow Norway AS

March 29, 2013April 01, 2013
1451
Arrow Offshore, Ltd.

January 10, 2014January 10, 2014
1452
Arrow Partners LP

January 10, 2014January 10, 2014
1453
Arrow Ridge Capital Master Fund, L.P.

November 01, 2016November 01, 2016
1454
Arrow UEC Japan

March 20, 2013March 21, 2013
1455
ARROWGRASS CAPITAL PARNTERS LLP

October 09, 2012October 09, 2012
1456
ARROWGRASS CUSTOMISED SOLUTIONS I LIMITED

September 08, 2015September 08, 2015
1457
ARROWGRASS DISTRESSED OPPORTUNITIES FUND LIMITED

September 08, 2015September 08, 2015
1458
ARROWGRASS EQUITY FOCUS FUND LIMITED

September 08, 2015September 08, 2015
1459
Arrowgrass Inflection Fund Limited

September 14, 2016September 14, 2016
1460
ARROWGRASS MASTER FUND LTD

September 08, 2015September 08, 2015
1461
Arrowhead Pipeline, L.P.

December 13, 2012December 13, 2012
1462
Arrowhead Senior Housing Associates Limited Partnership

December 07, 2016December 07, 2016
1463
Arrowhead Toledo Realty LP

June 10, 2013June 10, 2013
1464
Arrowpoint Acquisition Vehicle SPC 

November 19, 2014November 19, 2014
1465
Arrowpoint Asset Management LLC

December 14, 2012December 14, 2012
1466
Arrowpoint Asset Managment LLC

December 14, 2012December 17, 2012
1467
Arrowstreet Capital, Limited Partnership

September 19, 2016September 19, 2016
1468
Artemis Investment Management LLP

September 23, 2014September 23, 2014
1469
Artha Capital Management Inc.

October 04, 2012October 04, 2012
1470
Arthrex GmbH

April 19, 2017April 19, 2017
1471
Arthrex,Inc.

March 05, 2013March 05, 2013
1472
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.

August 20, 2013August 20, 2013
1473
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. (Illinois)

December 17, 2012December 17, 2012
1474
Artio Global Management LLC

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1475
Artio Global Management LLC

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1476
Artio Global Management LLC

December 05, 2012December 05, 2012
1477
Artis Capital Management, L.P.

April 25, 2013April 25, 2013
1478
Artisan Partners Limited Partnership

April 22, 2013April 23, 2013
1479
Artorius Trading

November 27, 2012November 27, 2012
1480
Arts & Sciences Partners, L.P.

January 11, 2017January 11, 2017
1481
Aruba Investments, Inc.

March 10, 2015March 10, 2015
1482
Arvest Bank

October 05, 2012October 08, 2012
1483
Arvest Bank Group Inc

October 15, 2012October 15, 2012
1484
ArvinMeritor Finance Ireland

October 05, 2012October 08, 2012
1485
ARWC - 100 CROSSING BOULEVARD LLC

March 10, 2014March 10, 2014
1486
Arxis Securities LLC

December 10, 2015December 11, 2015
1487
Arya Village

July 22, 2016July 25, 2016
1488
Aryzta AG

August 19, 2013August 19, 2013
1489
ARYZTA LLC

August 22, 2013August 22, 2013
1490
AS Cambrex Tallinn

May 01, 2013May 01, 2013
1491
ASB Bank Limited

February 27, 2013February 27, 2013
1492
ASBURY PLACE, L.P.

October 20, 2015October 20, 2015
1493
ASC Leasing I, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1494
ASC Leasing II, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1495
ASC Leasing III, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1496
ASC Leasing IV, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1497
ASC Leasing IX, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1498
ASC Leasing V, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1499
ASC Leasing VI, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015
1500
ASC Leasing VII, Inc.

September 01, 2015September 02, 2015









<<
<
1
2
3
4
>
>>





*
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



back to top





Protocol Selection


You have selected to adhere to the "". Click Proceed to continue or
			Back to choose a different protocol.


Back
Proceed










Functional Areas

Legal

Public Policy

Risk Management

Infrastructure Management

Research

Accounting

Protocol Management

Data, Reporting and FpML



Asset Classes

Credit Derivatives/CDS

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates Derivatives

FX Derivatives

Energy, Commodities

Structured Products and Other



Regions

Asia-Pacific

Canada

CEE, Middle East, Africa

Europe

Japan

Latin America

United States



Committees

Global Policy

Legal

Capital, Risk, Margin and Collateral

Market Infrastructure and Technology (MIT)

Clearing

Data

Trading

ISDA WGMR Implementation Initiative

Determinations Committees



Conferences

Conference Schedule

Accreditation

ISDA On Demand

ISDA AGM



Newsroom

Press Releases

Webcasts / Videos

derivatiViews

media.comment

dailyLead

ISDA In Review

Speeches & Presentations

Media  Contacts



About ISDA

About ISDA

Board of Directors

Executives

Mission Statement

Contact Us









				©2017
				International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. ISDA is a registered trademark of the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
Privacy policy








Login


 

Username / Email





Password





Remember me








Forgot password | Create account

Cancel
Log in




Reset Password


 

Username / Email








Log in | Create account

Cancel
Reset Password




Create New Account


 

Business email






Password





Confirm Password







Company *





Title *





Prefix





First Name *





Middle Name





Last Name *





Suffix





Telephone *





Fax







Address *



 



 





City *





Country *





State/Province





Postal Code *








Log in | Forgot password

Cancel
Back
Continue




Activate Account




Activate







Continue to site
Resend
Activate








 

James Zelter's involvement in venture capital (via Apollo Global Management Llc, Apollo Investment Corp, Apollo Asia Private Credit Fund Lp, Apollo Credit Senior Loan Feeder Lp, Apollo European Credit Fund (offshore) Lp, Apollo European Credit Fund Lp, Apollo/palmetto Loan Portfolio Lp, Apollo/jh Loan Portfolio Lp, Apollo/palmetto Short-maturity Loan Portfolio Lp, Apollo Strategic Value Offshore Fund Ltd, Apollo Strategic Value Fund Lp, Aion Feeder Iv Ltd, Aion Feeder Iii Ltd, Apollo Epf Ii Co-investor A Lp, Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund Iii Lp, Financial Credit Investment Ii Lp, Fci Co-investors Ii (a) Lp, Aion Feeder Ii Ltd, Aion Capital Partners Ltd, Apollo Total Return Fund (exempt) Lp, Apollo Offshore Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Ltd, Financial Credit Investment Ii (feeder) Lp, Apollo Total Return Co-investors (a) Lp, Apollo Emerging Markets Absolute Return Fund Lp, Apollo Credit Strategies Fund Lp, Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund (offshore) Iii Lp, Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp, Apollo Credit Fund Lp, Midcap Finco Ltd, Mc Feeder Ltd, Apollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp, Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp, Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd, Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp, Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp, Financial Credit Investment Iii Lp)































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/people/3555-james-zeltersection=people&subsection=detail&id=3555




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


JamesZelterGet alertedif James Zelter gets funded!James ZelterApollo Global Management Llc - Executive_OfficerApollo Investment Corp - Executive_Officer, DirectorApollo Asia Private Credit Fund Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Senior Loan Feeder Lp - Executive_OfficerApollo European Credit Fund (offshore) Lp - Executive_OfficerApollo European Credit Fund Lp - Executive_OfficerApollo/palmetto Loan Portfolio Lp - Promoter, Executive_OfficerApollo/jh Loan Portfolio Lp - Executive_Officer, PromoterApollo/palmetto Short-maturity Loan Portfolio Lp - Promoter, Executive_OfficerApollo Strategic Value Offshore Fund Ltd - Executive OfficerApollo Strategic Value Fund Lp - Executive OfficerAion Feeder Iv Ltd - DirectorAion Feeder Iii Ltd - DirectorApollo Epf Ii Co-investor A Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Opportunity Fund Iii Lp - Executive OfficerFinancial Credit Investment Ii Lp - Executive OfficerFci Co-investors Ii (a) Lp - Executive OfficerAion Feeder Ii Ltd - DirectorAion Capital Partners Ltd - DirectorApollo Total Return Fund (exempt) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Offshore Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Ltd - Executive OfficerFinancial Credit Investment Ii (feeder) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Total Return Co-investors (a) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Emerging Markets Absolute Return Fund Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Strategies Fund Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Opportunity Fund (offshore) Iii Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Fund Lp - Executive OfficerMidcap Finco Ltd - Director, Executive OfficerMc Feeder Ltd - Executive OfficerApollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd - Executive OfficerApollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp - Executive OfficerFinancial Credit Investment Iii Lp - Executive OfficerDeals involving James Zelter$4,880,494 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on January, 2012$13,409,148 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on November, 2011$543,494 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on October, 2011$15,365,881 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on August, 2011$1,278,624 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on July, 2011$13,507,500 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on April, 2011$29,411,449 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on March, 2011$18,296 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on January, 2011$79,835 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on October, 2010$218,750 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on August, 2010$10,777,760 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on July, 2010$4,328,946 raised with Apollo Global Management Llc on March, 2010$50,000,000 raised with Apollo Investment Corp on April, 2012$225,000,000 raised with Apollo Investment Corp on October, 2010$172,400,000 raised with Apollo Asia Private Credit Fund Lp on April, 2013$155,100,000 raised with Apollo Asia Private Credit Fund Lp on April, 2012$15,000,000 raised with Apollo Credit Senior Loan Feeder Lp on June, 2012$15,000,000 raised with Apollo Credit Senior Loan Feeder Lp on April, 2011$8,500,000 raised with Apollo European Credit Fund (offshore) Lp on December, 2011$128,875,000 raised with Apollo European Credit Fund Lp on December, 2011$155,000,000 raised with Apollo/palmetto Loan Portfolio Lp on July, 2010$50,100,000 raised with Apollo/jh Loan Portfolio Lp on October, 2010$100,000,000 raised with Apollo/palmetto Short-maturity Loan Portfolio Lp on October, 2011$1,090,460 raised with Apollo Strategic Value Offshore Fund Ltd on September, 2012$267,269,104 raised with Apollo Strategic Value Fund Lp on September, 2012$100,000,000 raised with Aion Feeder Iv Ltd on September, 2013$100,000,000 raised with Aion Feeder Iv Ltd on September, 2012$75,500,000 raised with Aion Feeder Iii Ltd on September, 2013$75,000,000 raised with Aion Feeder Iii Ltd on September, 2012$1,002,995 raised with Apollo Epf Ii Co-investor A Lp on October, 2012$1,014,329,750 raised with Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund Iii Lp on December, 2013Undisclosed raised with Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund Iii Lp on December, 2012$813,395,000 raised with Financial Credit Investment Ii Lp on July, 2014Undisclosed raised with Financial Credit Investment Ii Lp on June, 2013$84,570,000 raised with Fci Co-investors Ii (a) Lp on July, 2014Undisclosed raised with Fci Co-investors Ii (a) Lp on June, 2013$30,000,000 raised with Aion Feeder Ii Ltd on December, 2013$98,750,000 raised with Aion Capital Partners Ltd on December, 2013Undisclosed raised with Apollo Total Return Fund (exempt) Lp on February, 2014$199,900,000 raised with Apollo Offshore Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Ltd on November, 2014Undisclosed raised with Apollo Offshore Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Ltd on March, 2014$23,000,000 raised with Financial Credit Investment Ii (feeder) Lp on March, 2014Undisclosed raised with Apollo Total Return Co-investors (a) Lp on May, 2014Undisclosed raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Absolute Return Fund Lp on October, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Absolute Return Fund Lp on June, 2014$370,000,000 raised with Apollo Credit Strategies Fund Lp on August, 2014$650,500,000 raised with Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund (offshore) Iii Lp on September, 2014$461,762,500 raised with Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund (offshore) Iii Lp on August, 2014$49,700,000 raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp on September, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp on August, 2014$3,729,623,797 raised with Apollo Credit Fund Lp on September, 2014$1,274,134,028 raised with Midcap Finco Ltd on February, 2015$1,000,895,069 raised with Midcap Finco Ltd on November, 2014$80,000,000 raised with Mc Feeder Ltd on November, 2014$1,045,161,750 raised with Apollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp on May, 2015$236,835,750 raised with Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp on September, 2015$35,500,000 raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd on September, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp on December, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp on May, 2016$342,132,834 raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp on May, 2016Undisclosed raised with Financial Credit Investment Iii Lp on June, 2016Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Some of the profile information was collected using the Crunchbase API. For more details on the profile, please check James Zelter on Crunchbase.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment! 

William Kuesel's involvement in venture capital (via Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp, Apollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp, Prime Security Services Topco Parent Lp, Apollo Natural Resources Partners Ii Lp, Apollo Anrp Co-investors Ii (b) Lp, Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp, Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd, Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp, Ap Viii Prime Security Services Holdings Lp, Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp, Financial Credit Investment Iii Lp)































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/people/222447-william-kueselsection=people&subsection=detail&id=222447




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


WilliamKueselGet alertedif William Kuesel gets funded!William KueselApollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp - Executive OfficerPrime Security Services Topco Parent Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Natural Resources Partners Ii Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Anrp Co-investors Ii (b) Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd - Executive OfficerApollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp - Executive OfficerAp Viii Prime Security Services Holdings Lp - Executive OfficerApollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp - Executive OfficerFinancial Credit Investment Iii Lp - Executive OfficerDeals involving William Kuesel$49,700,000 raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp on September, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (onshore) Lp on August, 2014$1,045,161,750 raised with Apollo Energy Opportunity Fund Lp on May, 2015$62,206,310 raised with Prime Security Services Topco Parent Lp on July, 2015$1,624,543,063 raised with Apollo Natural Resources Partners Ii Lp on November, 2015$1,327,946,250 raised with Apollo Natural Resources Partners Ii Lp on September, 2015$5,850,000 raised with Apollo Anrp Co-investors Ii (b) Lp on September, 2015$236,835,750 raised with Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Fund Iii Lp on September, 2015$35,500,000 raised with Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Fund (offshore) Ltd on September, 2015Undisclosed raised with Apollo Total Return Fund Enhanced (exempt) Lp on December, 2015Undisclosed raised with Ap Viii Prime Security Services Holdings Lp on April, 2016Undisclosed raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp on May, 2016$342,132,834 raised with Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Fund Lp on May, 2016Undisclosed raised with Financial Credit Investment Iii Lp on June, 2016Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Some of the profile information was collected using the Crunchbase API. For more details on the profile, please check William Kuesel on Crunchbase.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!

      Federal Register
       :: 
      Apollo Investment Corporation, et al.; Notice of Application
    




















































  Skip to Content








 



    Sections
    
 




            Money
 



            Environment
 



            World
 



            Science & Technology
 



            Business & Industry
 



            Health & Public Welfare
 













Minority and Women Inclusion Amendments


                by the Federal Housing Finance Agency
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                futureatlas.com






 
 








Dodd-Frank Wall Steet Reform


                          256
                          documents in the last year
                        



Government Contracts


                          50
                          documents in the last year
                        





Stock & Commodities Trading 


                          490
                          documents in the last year
                        



Economic Sanctions & Foreign Assets Control


                          658
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      16
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      4
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Migratory Bird Permits


                by the Fish and Wildlife Service
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                Georgie Sharp






 
 








Endangered & Threatened Species


                          914
                          documents in the last year
                        



Fishery Management


                          1518
                          documents in the last year
                        





Taking of Marine Mammals


                          310
                          documents in the last year
                        



Parks & Recreation


                          935
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      21
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      2
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Safety Zone


                by the Coast Guard
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                Gablif






 
 








Immigration & Border Control


                          252
                          documents in the last year
                        



Cultural Objects Imported for Exhibition


                          99
                          documents in the last year
                        





International Trade (Anti-Dumping)


                          831
                          documents in the last year
                        



Controlled Exports (CCL & USML)


                          62
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      16
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      3
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Fisheries of the Caribbean, Gulf of Mexico, and South Atlantic


                by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                LASZLO ILYES






 
 








Broadband Policy


                          167
                          documents in the last year
                        



Patent, Trademark, and Copyright


                          1350
                          documents in the last year
                        





Energy Efficiency & Renewable Resources


                          346
                          documents in the last year
                        



Climate Change


                          349
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      37
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      5
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Radio Broadcasting Services


                by the Federal Communications Commission
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                Alex Kahn






 
 








Automobile Safety & Fuel Economy


                          47
                          documents in the last year
                        



Oil and Gas Leasing


                          32
                          documents in the last year
                        





Air Travel


                          92
                          documents in the last year
                        



Trade Adjustment Assistance


                          99
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      50
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      4
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Food Labeling


                by the Food and Drug Administration
                on
                07/25/2017




                photo by:
                Bruno Girin






 
 








Health Care Reform


                          193
                          documents in the last year
                        



Veterans Educational Benefits


                          1
                          documents in the last year
                        





Veterans Employment & Training


                          48
                          documents in the last year
                        



Disaster Declarations & Assistance


                          884
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      33
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      8
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 







    Browse
    
 




          Agencies
 



          Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)
 



          Dates
 



          Public Inspection
 



          Executive Orders
 




  Explore Agencies



















Agriculture Department

22


15



Commerce Department

58


13



Defense Department

16


5



Education Department

15


3



Energy Department

45


4



Environmental Protection Agency

33


27



Health and Human Services Department

62


23



Homeland Security Department

56


9



Interior Department

28


11



Justice Department

17


2



Labor Department

6


6



State Department

6


4



Transportation Department

64


37



Treasury Department

11


9



Veterans Affairs Department

7


9








  Explore Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)



















Administrative practice and procedure

13


5



Air pollution control

11


10



Air transportation

16


9



Airspace

12


2



Aviation safety

16


14



Environmental protection

13


11



Intergovernmental relations

11


9



Navigation (air)

13


2



Ozone

8


3



Volatile organic compounds

8


4












            Current Issue

              
                214 Pages
              




99 documents
    from 48 agencies

  



73 Notices


1 Presidential Document


7 Proposed Rules


18 Rules


3 Significant Documents









Go to a specific date

Go to a specific date:


 





Explore


« PrevJuneNext »SMTWTFS282930311234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829301


« PrevJulySMTWTFS2526272829301234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303112345












          The Public Inspection page
          on FederalRegister.gov
          offers a preview of documents scheduled to appear in the next day's
          Federal Register issue. The Public Inspection page may also
          include documents scheduled for later issues, at the request
          of the issuing agency.
        










Special Filing

          updated on 04:15 PM, on Tuesday, July 25, 2017
        


9 documents
            from 6 agencies
          


4 Notices


1 Proposed Rule


4 Rules









Regular Filing

          updated on 08:45 AM, on Tuesday, July 25, 2017
        


118 documents
            from 46 agencies
          


109 Notices


1 Presidential Document


6 Proposed Rules


2 Rules














Go to a specific date

Go to a specific date:


 





Explore


« PrevJuneNext »SMTWTFS282930311234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829301


« PrevJulySMTWTFS2526272829301234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303112345












Donald Trump


EO 13805:
Establishing a Presidential Advisory Council on Infrastructure


EO 13804:
Allowing Additional Time for Recognizing Positive Actions by the Government of Sudan and Amending Executive Order 13761


EO 13803:
Reviving the National Space Council




                  2017:
                  41







Barack Obama


                  2017:
                  7


                  2016:
                  41


                  2015:
                  29


                  2014:
                  31


                  2013:
                  21


                  2012:
                  38


                  2011:
                  34


                  2010:
                  37


                  2009:
                  37







George W. Bush


                  2009:
                  3


                  2008:
                  30


                  2007:
                  33


                  2006:
                  26


                  2005:
                  27


                  2004:
                  46


                  2003:
                  40


                  2002:
                  33


                  2001:
                  51







William J. Clinton


                  2001:
                  7


                  2000:
                  39


                  1999:
                  35


                  1998:
                  38


                  1997:
                  38


                  1996:
                  50


                  1995:
                  40


                  1994:
                  54












    Search
    





        Document Search
 



        Advanced Document Search
 



        Public Inspection Search
 



        FR Index
 





    Reader Aids
    



Reader Aids Home


Office of the Federal Register Blog


Using FederalRegister.Gov


Understanding the Federal Register


Recent Site Updates


Videos & Tutorials


Developer Resources


Government Policy and OFR Procedures






    My FR
    




My Account


My Clipboard


My Comments


My Subscriptions


Sign In / Sign Up





Search the Federal Register


 





0



Sign in
Sign up

 









The Federal Register
The Daily Journal of the United States Government










Legal Status
Legal Status 
 
  Notice



Apollo Investment Corporation, et al.; Notice of Application


      A Notice by the Securities and Exchange Commission on 03/08/2016











 













Document DetailsInformation about this document as published in the Federal Register.

Printed version:

PDF

Publication Date:

03/08/2016

Agency:

Securities and Exchange Commission

Dates:
The application was filed on February 16, 2010, and amended on November 17, 2010, November 23, 2011, July 26, 2012, February 12, 2013, March 21, 2014, November 26, 2014 and March 1, 2016.
Document Type:
Notice
Document Citation:

          81 FR 12165
        
Page:

          12165-12174
          (10 pages)
        
Agency/Docket Numbers:
Release No. IC-32019
File No. 812-13754
Document Number:
2016-05043

Document Details



















Enhanced Content - Table of Contents

            This tables of contents is a navigational tool, processed from the
            headings within the legal text of Federal Register documents.
            This repetition of headings to form internal navigation links
            has no substantive legal effect.
          

AGENCY:
ACTION:
ADDRESSES:
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:
Introduction
Applicants
Applicants' Representations
A. Allocation Process
B. Follow-On Investments
C. Dispositions
D. Delayed Settlement
E. Holders
Applicants' Legal Analysis
Applicants' Conditions
Footnotes

Enhanced Content - Table of Contents 



Enhanced Content - Submit Public Comment


              This feature is not available for this document.
          

Enhanced Content - Submit Public Comment 



Enhanced Content - Read Public Comments


              This feature is not available for this document.
          

Enhanced Content - Read Public Comments 


Enhanced Content - Sharing

Shorter Document URL

https://www.federalregister.gov/d/2016-05043
https://www.federalregister.gov/d/2016-05043






              Email this document to a friend
            



Share this document on Twitter



Share this document on Facebook


Enhanced Content - Sharing 



Enhanced Content - Document Print View

Print this document

Enhanced Content - Document Print View 


Enhanced Content - Document Tools

            These tools are designed to help you understand the official document
            better and aid in comparing the online edition to the print edition.
          



                These markup elements allow the user to see how the document follows the
                
                  Document Drafting Handbook
                 that agencies use to create their documents. These can be useful
                for better understanding how a document is structured but
                are not part of the published document itself.
              
Display Non-Printed Markup Elements


Enhanced Content - Document Tools 


Enhanced Content - Developer Tools

          This document is available in the following developer friendly formats:
        


JSON: Normalized attributes and metadata


XML: Original full text XML


MODS: Government Publishing Office metadata



          More information and documentation can be found in our
          developer tools pages.
        
Enhanced Content - Developer Tools 


Official Content


View printed version (PDF)


Official Content 


Public Inspection



              This PDF is
              the current document as it appeared on Public Inspection on
              03/07/2016 at 08:45 am.
            

              If you are using public inspection listings for legal research, you
    should verify the contents of the documents against a final, official
    edition of the Federal Register. Only official editions of the
    Federal Register provide legal notice to the public and judicial notice
    to the courts under 44 U.S.C. 1503 & 1507.
    Learn more here.
            

Public Inspection 


Published DocumentThis document has been published in the Federal Register. Use the PDF linked in the document sidebar for the official electronic format.





Start Preamble
        
        
        
        March 2, 2016.
        
          AGENCY:
Securities and Exchange Commission (“Commission”).
ACTION:
Notice of application for an order under sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the Investment Company Act of 1940 (the “Act”) and rule 17d-1 under the Act to permit certain joint transactions otherwise prohibited by sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) of the Act and rule 17d-1 under the Act.

Summary of Application: Applicants request an order to permit certain business development companies and closed-end management investment companies to co-invest in portfolio companies with each other and with affiliated investment funds.

Applicants: Apollo Investment Corporation (“AIC”), Apollo Tactical Income Fund Inc. (“AIF”), Apollo Investment Management, L.P. (“AIM”), Apollo Management VII, L.P., Apollo Management VIII, L.P., Apollo Global Real Estate Management, L.P., Apollo Capital Management, L.P., Apollo SVF Management, L.P., Apollo Value Management, L.P., Apollo Europe Management, L.P., Apollo EPF Management, L.P., Apollo Credit Opportunity Management III LLC, Apollo Credit Management II, L.P., Apollo Credit Management (CLO), LLC, Apollo Credit Management II GP, LLC, Athene Asset Management, L.P., Apollo Credit Management, LLC (“ACM”), Apollo Palmetto Strategic Partnership, L.P., Apollo Special Opportunities Managed Account, L.P., Apollo Investment Europe II, L.P., Apollo Credit Opportunity Fund III LP, Apollo Investment Fund VII, L.P., Apollo Investment Fund VIII, L.P., Apollo Start Printed Page 12166Commercial Real Estate Finance, Inc., ACREFI Management, LLC, Apollo Credit Senior Loan Fund, L.P., Apollo Senior Floating Rate Fund Inc. (“ASFRF”), ALM IV, Ltd., AGRE U.S. Real Estate Fund, L.P., ALM V, Ltd., Apollo Longevity, LLC, A-A European Senior Debt Fund, L.P., Apollo Management Singapore Pte. Ltd., Apollo European Strategic Management, L.P., Apollo European Strategic Investments (Holdings), L.P., Apollo Residential Mortgage, Inc., ARM Manager, LLC, AGRE Debt Fund I, L.P., AGRE-CRE Debt Manager, LLC, Apollo Natural Resources Partners, L.P., Apollo Commodities Management, L.P., Financial Credit Investment I, L.P., Financial Credit Investment I Manager, LLC, Apollo European Senior Debt Management, LLC, Apollo/Palmetto Short-Maturity Loan Portfolio, L.P., Apollo Credit Management (Senior Loans), LLC, 2011 Stone Tower HY Cayman Fund Trust, AGRE NA Management, LLC, ALM X, Ltd., ALM VI, Ltd., ALM VII, Ltd., ALM VII (R), LTD., ALM VII (R)-2, LTD., ALM VIII, Ltd., ALM IX, Ltd., ALM XI, Ltd., ALM XII, Ltd., ALM XIV, Ltd., Apollo AF Loan Trust 2012, Apollo Asia Private Credit Master Fund Pte., Ltd., Apollo Centre Street Management, LLC, Apollo Centre Street Partnership, L.P., Apollo Credit Management (Senior Loans) II, LLC, Apollo Credit Master Fund Ltd., Apollo Credit Strategies Master Fund Ltd., Apollo EPF II Partnership, Apollo EPF Management II, L.P., Apollo European Credit Management, L.P., Apollo European Credit Master Fund, L.P., Apollo SK Strategic Investments, L.P., Apollo SK Strategic Management, LLC, Apollo ST Debt Advisors LLC, Apollo ST Fund Management LLC, Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Master Fund II Ltd., Cornerstone CLO Ltd., Rampart CLO 2006-I Ltd., Rampart CLO 2007 Ltd., Stone Tower CLO V Ltd., Stone Tower CLO VI Ltd., Stone Tower CLO VII Ltd., Stone Tower Loan Trust 2010, Stone Tower Loan Trust 2011, Merx Aviation Finance, LLC (“Merx”), Athene Holding Ltd. (“Athene”), MidCap FinCo Holdings Limited (“MidCap”), ALME Loan Funding 2013-1 Limited, ALME Loan Funding II Limited, ALME Loan Funding IV B.V., ALME Loan Funding III Limited, Apollo Capital Spectrum Fund, L.P., Apollo Capital Spectrum Management, LLC, Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Master Fund, L.P., Apollo Credit Short Opportunities Management, LLC, Apollo Franklin Management, LLC, Apollo Franklin Partnership, L.P., Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Management III LLC, Apollo Structured Credit Recovery Master Fund III L.P., Apollo Total Return Management LLC, Apollo Total Return Master Fund L.P., Apollo Zeus Strategic Management, LLC, Apollo Zeus Strategic Investments, L.P., AP Investment Europe III, L.P., AESI II, L.P., Apollo Lincoln Fixed Income Fund, L.P., Apollo Lincoln Private Credit Fund, L.P., Apollo Emerging Markets Debt Master Fund LP, Apollo Emerging Markets Fixed Income Strategies Fund, L.P. Financial Credit Investment II, L.P., Financial Credit Investment II Manager, LLC, Apollo U.S. Real Estate Fund II, L.P., ALM XIX, Ltd., ALM XVI, Ltd., ALM XVII, Ltd., ALM XVIII, Ltd., Apollo A-N Credit Fund, L.P., Apollo A-N Credit Management, LLC, Apollo Hercules Management, LLC, Apollo Hercules Partners, L.P., Apollo Management International LLP, Apollo Moultrie Credit Fund Management, LLC, Apollo Moultrie Credit Fund, L.P., Apollo NA Management II, LLC, Apollo Tactical Value SPN Investments, L.P., Apollo Tactical Value SPN Management, LLC, Apollo Thunder Management, LLC, Apollo Thunder Partners, L.P., Apollo Total Return Enhanced Management, LLC, Apollo Total Return Master Fund Enhanced, L.P., Apollo Union Street Management, LLC, Apollo Union Street Partners, L.P., Financial Credit Investment III Manager, LLC, and Financial Credit Investment III, L.P.

Filing Dates: The application was filed on February 16, 2010, and amended on November 17, 2010, November 23, 2011, July 26, 2012, February 12, 2013, March 21, 2014, November 26, 2014 and March 1, 2016.

Hearing or Notification of Hearing: An order granting the requested relief will be issued unless the Commission orders a hearing. Interested persons may request a hearing by writing to the Commission's Secretary and serving applicants with a copy of the request, personally or by mail. Hearing requests should be received by the Commission by 5:30 p.m. on March 28, 2016, and should be accompanied by proof of service on applicants, in the form of an affidavit or, for lawyers, a certificate of service. Pursuant to rule 0-5 under the Act, hearing requests should state the nature of the writer's interest, any facts bearing upon the desirability of a hearing on the matter, the reason for the request, and the issues contested. Persons who wish to be notified of a hearing may request notification by writing to the Commission's Secretary.
ADDRESSES:
Secretary, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, 100 F St. NE., Washington, DC 20549-1090. Applicants: 9 West 57th Street, New York, NY 10019.
Start Further Info
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:
David J. Marcinkus, Senior Counsel, or Dalia Blass, Assistant Chief Counsel, at (202) 551-6821 (Chief Counsel's Office, Division of Investment Management).
End Further Info
End Preamble
Start Supplemental Information
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:
The following is a summary of the application. The complete application may be obtained via the Commission's Web site by searching for the file number, or for an applicant using the Company name box, at http://www.sec.gov/​search/​search.htm or by calling (202) 551-8090.
Introduction
1. The Applicants request an order of the Commission under Sections 17(d) and 57(i) and Rule 17d-1 thereunder (the “Order”) to permit, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the application (the “Conditions”), a Regulated Fund [1] 
           and one or more other Regulated Funds and/or one or more Affiliated Funds [2] 
           to enter into Co-Investment Transactions with each other. “Co-Investment Transaction” means any transaction in which a Regulated Fund (or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub) participated together with one or more Affiliated Funds and/or one or more other Regulated Funds in reliance on the Order. “Potential Co-Investment Transaction” means any investment opportunity in which a Regulated Fund (or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub) could not participate together with one or more Affiliated Funds and/or one or more other Regulated Funds without obtaining and relying on the Order.[3] 

Start Printed Page 12167
Applicants
2. AIC is a closed-end management investment company incorporated in Maryland that has elected to be regulated as a business development company (“BDC”) under the Act.[4] 
           AIC's Board [5] 
           currently consists of eight members, six of whom are Independent Directors.[6] 
           ASFRF and AIF are Maryland corporations that are registered as closed-end management investment companies. Each of ASFRF's and AIF's Board currently consists of six members, four of whom are Independent Directors.
3. AIM, a Delaware limited partnership that is registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (the “Advisers Act”), serves as the investment adviser to AIC. ACM, a Delaware limited liability company that is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act, serves as investment adviser to ASFRF and AIF.
4. Merx, a Delaware limited liability company, is a special purpose vehicle owned by AIC. AIM serves as Merx's investment adviser. Applicants state that Merx engages primarily in aircraft leasing and related businesses and is thus excluded from investment company status under Section 3(a). Merx is a BDC Downstream Fund.[7] 
           If Applicants receive the requested Order, Merx may on occasion engage in Co-Investment Transactions with other Regulated Funds and with Affiliated Funds.[8] 

5. The Existing Affiliated Funds are the investment funds identified in Appendix A to the application. Applicants represent that each Existing Affiliated Fund is a separate and distinct legal entity and each, other than Athene and MidCap, would be an investment company but for Section 3(c)(1), 3(c)(5)(C) or 3(c)(7) of the Act. Applicants state that Athene Holding does not come within the definition of investment company in Section 3(a)(1). As described in the application, Applicants state that Athene engages in the insurance business through wholly-owned subsidiary insurance companies which are excluded from investment company status by either Rule 3a-6 or Section 3(c)(3). Applicants state that Athene also invests through its controlled affiliate MidCap, which currently is excluded from investment company status by Section 3(b)(1), 3(c)(5) or 3(c)(6).[9] 
           As with the other Affiliated Funds, each of Athene and MidCap is advised by an Adviser pursuant to a separate investment management agreement.
6. The Existing Advisers to Affiliated Funds, identified in Appendix A to the application, are the investment advisers to the Existing Affiliated Funds. Each of the Existing Advisers to Affiliated Funds is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act.
7. Each of the Applicants may be deemed to be controlled by Apollo Global Management, LLC (“AGM”), a publicly traded company. AGM owns controlling interests in the Advisers and, thus, may be deemed to control the Regulated Funds and the Affiliated Funds. Applicants state that AGM is a holding company and does not currently offer investment advisory services to any person and is not expected to do so in the future. Applicants state that as a result, AGM has not been included as an Applicant.
8. Applicants state that a Regulated Fund may, from time to time, form one or more Wholly-Owned Investment Subs.[10] 

           Such a subsidiary may be prohibited from investing in a Co-Investment Transaction with a Regulated Fund (other than its parent) or any Affiliated Fund because it would be a company controlled by its parent Regulated Entity for purposes of Section 57(a)(4) and Rule 17d-1. Applicants request that each Wholly-Owned Investment Sub be permitted to participate in Co-Investment Transactions in lieu of the Regulated Entity that owns it and that the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub's participation in any such transaction be treated, for purposes of the Order, as though the parent Regulated Fund were participating directly. Applicants represent that this treatment is justified because a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub would have no purpose other than serving as a holding vehicle for the Regulated Fund's investments and, therefore, no conflicts of interest could arise between the parent Regulated Fund and the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub. The Board of the parent Regulated Fund would make all relevant determinations under the Conditions with regard to a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub's participation in a Co-Investment Transaction, and the Board would be informed of, and take into consideration, any proposed use of a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub in the Regulated Fund's place. If the parent Regulated Fund proposes to participate in the same Co-Investment Transaction with any of its Wholly-Owned Investment Subs, the Board of the parent Regulated Fund will also be informed of, and take into consideration, the relative participation Start Printed Page 12168of the Regulated Fund and the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub.
Applicants' Representations
A. Allocation Process
9. Applicants state that the Advisers are presented with thousands of investment opportunities each year on behalf of their clients and must determine how to allocate those opportunities in a manner that, over time, is fair and equitable to all of their clients. Such investment opportunities may be Potential Co-Investment Transactions.
10. Applicants represent that they have established processes for allocating initial investment opportunities, opportunities for subsequent investments in an issuer and dispositions of securities holdings reasonably designed to treat all clients fairly and equitably. Further, Applicants represent that these processes will be extended and modified in a manner reasonably designed to ensure that the additional transactions permitted under the Order will both (i) be fair and equitable to the Regulated Funds and the Affiliated Funds and (ii) comply with the Conditions.
11. Specifically, applicants state that the Advisers are organized and managed such that the individual portfolio managers, as well as the teams and committees of portfolio managers, analysts and senior management (“Investment Teams” and “Investment Committees”), responsible for evaluating investment opportunities and making investment decisions on behalf of clients are promptly notified of the opportunities. If the requested Order is granted, the Advisers will establish, maintain and implement policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure that, when such opportunities arise, the Advisers to the relevant Regulated Funds are promptly notified and receive the same information about the opportunity as any other Advisers considering the opportunity for their clients. In particular, consistent with Condition 1, if a Potential Co-Investment Transaction falls within the then-current Objectives and Strategies [11] 
           and any Board-Established Criteria [12] 
           of a Regulated Fund, the policies and procedures will require that the relevant portfolio managers, Investment Teams and Investment Committees responsible for that Regulated Fund receive sufficient information to allow the Regulated Fund's Adviser to make its independent determination and recommendations under the Conditions.
12. The Adviser to each applicable Regulated Fund will then make an independent determination of the appropriateness of the investment for the Regulated Fund in light of the Regulated Fund's then-current circumstances. If the Adviser to a Regulated Fund deems the Regulated Fund's participation in such Potential Co-Investment Transaction to be appropriate, then it will formulate a recommendation regarding the proposed order amount for the Regulated Fund.
13. Applicants state that, for each Regulated Fund and Affiliated Fund whose Adviser recommends participating in a Potential Co-Investment Transaction, the Adviser will submit a proposed order amount to the internal trading function, which is comprised of a group of individual traders who collect and execute trades. Applicants state further that each proposed order amount may be reviewed and adjusted, in accordance with the Advisers' written allocation policies and procedures, by an allocation committee for the area in question (e.g., credit, private equity, real estate) on which senior management, legal and compliance personnel from that area participate or, in the case of issues involving multiple areas or AGM as a whole, an AGM-wide allocation committee on which senior management, legal and compliance personnel for AGM participate.[13] 
           The order of a Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund resulting from this process is referred to as its “Internal Order”. The Internal Order will be submitted for approval by the Required Majority of any participating Regulated Funds in accordance with the Conditions.[14] 

14. If the aggregate Internal Orders for a Potential Co-Investment Transaction do not exceed the size of the investment opportunity immediately prior to the submission of the orders to the underwriter, broker, dealer or issuer, as applicable (the “External Submission”), then each Internal Order will be fulfilled as placed. If, on the other hand, the aggregate Internal Orders for a Potential Co-Investment Transaction exceed the size of the investment opportunity immediately prior to the External Submission, then the allocation of the opportunity will be made pro rata on the basis of the size of the Internal Orders.[15] 

           If, subsequent to such External Submission, the size of the opportunity is increased or decreased, or if the terms of such opportunity, or the facts and circumstances applicable to the Regulated Funds' or the Affiliated Funds' consideration of the opportunity, change, the participants will be permitted to submit revised Internal Orders in accordance with written Start Printed Page 12169allocation policies and procedures that the Advisers will establish, implement and maintain.[16] 

B. Follow-On Investments
15. Applicants state that from time to time the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds may have opportunities to make Follow-On Investments [17] 
           in an issuer in which a Regulated Fund and one or more other Regulated Funds and/or Affiliated Funds previously have invested.
16. Applicants propose that Follow-On Investments would be divided into two categories depending on whether the prior investment was a Co-Investment Transaction or a Pre-Boarding Investment.[18] 
           If the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds had previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer, then the terms and approval of the Follow-On Investment would be subject to the Standard Review Follow-Ons described in Condition 8. If the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds have not previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer but hold a Pre-Boarding Investment, then the terms and approval of the Follow-On Investment would be subject to the Enhanced-Review Follow-Ons described in Condition 9. All Enhanced Review Follow-Ons require the approval of the Required Majority. For a given issuer, the participating Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds would need to comply with the requirements of Enhanced-Review Follow-Ons only for the first Co-Investment Transaction. Subsequent Co-Investment Transactions with respect to the issuer would be governed by the requirements of Standard Review Follow-Ons.
17. A Regulated Fund would be permitted to invest in Standard Review Follow-Ons either with the approval of the Required Majority under Condition 8(c) or without Board approval under Condition 8(b) if it is (i) a Pro Rata Follow-On Investment [19] 
           or (ii) a Non-Negotiated Follow-On Investment.[20] 
           Applicants believe that these Pro Rata and Non-Negotiated Follow-On Investments do not present a significant opportunity for overreaching on the part of any Adviser and thus do not warrant the time or the attention of the Board. Pro Rata Follow-One Investments and Non-Negotiated Follow-On Investments remain subject to the Board's periodic review in accordance with Condition 10.
C. Dispositions
18. Applicants propose that Dispositions [21] 
           would be divided into two categories. If the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds holding investments in the issuer had previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer, then the terms and approval of the Disposition would be subject to the Standard Review Dispositions described in Condition 6. If the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds have not previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer but hold a Pre-Boarding Investment, then the terms and approval of the Disposition would be subject to the Enhanced Review Dispositions described in Condition 7. Subsequent Dispositions with respect to the same issuer would be governed by Condition 6 under the Standard Review Dispositions.[22] 

19. A Regulated Fund may participate in a Standard Review Disposition either with the approval of the Required Majority under Condition 6(d) or without Board approval under Condition 6(c) if (i) the Disposition is a Pro Rata Disposition [23] 
           or (ii) the securities are Tradable Securities [24] 
           and the Disposition meets the other requirements of Condition 6(c)(ii). Pro Rata Dispositions and Dispositions of a Tradable Security remain subject to the Board's periodic review in accordance with Condition 10.
D. Delayed Settlement
20. Applicants represent that under the terms and Conditions of the Application, all Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds participating in a Co-Start Printed Page 12170Investment Transaction will invest at the same time, for the same price and with the same terms, conditions, class, registration rights and any other rights, so that none of them receives terms more favorable than any other. However, the settlement date for an Affiliated Fund in a Co-Investment Transaction may occur up to ten business days after the settlement date for the Regulated Fund, and vice versa.[25] 
           Nevertheless, in all cases, (i) the date on which the commitment of the Affiliated Funds and Regulated Funds is made will be the same even where the settlement date is not and (ii) the earliest settlement date and the latest settlement date of any Affiliated Fund or Regulated Fund participating in the transaction will occur within ten business days of each other.
E. Holders
21. Under Condition 15, if an Adviser, its principals, or any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Adviser or its principals, and the Affiliated Funds (collectively, the “Holders”) own in the aggregate more than 25 percent of the outstanding voting shares of a Regulated Fund (the “Shares”), then the Holders will vote such Shares as directed by an independent third party when voting on matters specified in the Condition. Applicants believe that this Condition will ensure that the Independent Directors will act independently in evaluating Co-Investment Transactions, because the ability of the Adviser or its principals to influence the Independent Directors by a suggestion, explicit or implied, that the Independent Directors can be removed will be limited significantly. The Independent Directors shall evaluate and approve any independent party, taking into account its qualifications, reputation for independence, cost to the shareholders, and other factors that they deem relevant.
Applicants' Legal Analysis
1. Section 17(d) of the Act and rule 17d-1 under the Act prohibit participation by a registered investment company and an affiliated person in any “joint enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing plan,” as defined in the rule, without prior approval by the Commission by order upon application. Section 17(d) of the Act and rule 17d-1 under the Act are applicable to Regulated Funds that are registered closed-end investment companies.
2. Similarly, with regard to BDCs, section 57(a)(4) of the Act generally prohibits certain persons specified in section 57(b) from participating in joint transactions with the BDC or a company controlled by the BDC in contravention of rules as prescribed by the Commission. Section 57(i) of the Act provides that, until the Commission prescribes rules under section 57(a)(4), the Commission's rules under section 17(d) of the Act applicable to registered closed-end investment companies will be deemed to apply to transactions subject to section 57(a)(4). Because the Commission has not adopted any rules under section 57(a)(4), rule 17d-1 also applies to joint transactions with Regulated Funds that are BDCs.
3. Co-Investment Transactions are prohibited by either or both of Rule 17d-1 and Section 57(a)(4) without a prior exemptive order of the Commission to the extent that the Affiliated Funds and the Regulated Funds participating in such transactions fall within the category of persons described by Rule 17d-1 and/or Section 57(b), as applicable, vis-à-vis each participating Regulated Fund. Each of the participating Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds may be deemed to be affiliated persons vis-à-vis a Regulated Fund within the meaning of section 2(a)(3) by reason of common control because (i) controlled affiliates of AGM manage each of the Affiliated Funds and ASFRF and AIF and may be deemed to control any future Regulated Fund, (ii) AGM controls AIM, which manages AIC, and (iii) AIC Downstream Funds, are, and, in the future will be, deemed to be controlled by AIM, AIC or certain of AIC's subsidiaries. Thus, each of the Affiliated Funds could be deemed to be a person related to the AIC Funds in a manner described by Section 57(b) and related to the other Regulated Funds in a manner described by Rule 17d-1; and therefore the prohibitions of Rule 17d-1 and Section 57(a)(4) would apply respectively to prohibit the Affiliated Funds from participating in Co-Investment Transactions with the Regulated Funds.
4. In passing upon applications under rule 17d-1, the Commission considers whether the company's participation in the joint transaction is consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and the extent to which such participation is on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of other participants.
5. Applicants state that in the absence of the requested relief, in many circumstances the Regulated Funds would be limited in their ability to participate in attractive and appropriate investment opportunities. Applicants state that, as required by Rule 17d-1(b), the Conditions ensure that the terms on which Co-Investment Transactions may be made will be consistent with the participation of the Regulated Funds being on a basis that it is neither different from nor less advantageous than other participants, thus protecting the equity holders of any participant from being disadvantaged. Applicants further state that the Conditions ensure that all Co-Investment Transactions are reasonable and fair to the Regulated Funds and their shareholders and do not involve overreaching by any person concerned, including the Advisers. Applicants state that the Regulated Funds' participation in the Co-Investment Transactions in accordance with the Conditions will be consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and would be done in a manner that is not different from, or less advantageous than, that of other participants.
Applicants' Conditions
Applicants agree that the Order will be subject to the following Conditions:
1. Identification and Referral of Potential Co-Investment Transactions.

(a) The Advisers will establish, maintain and implement policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure that each Adviser is promptly notified of all Potential Co-Investment Transactions that fall within the then-current Objectives and Strategies and Board-Established Criteria of any Regulated Fund the Adviser manages.
(b) When an Adviser to a Regulated Fund is notified of a Potential Co-Investment Transaction under Condition 1(a), the Adviser will make an independent determination of the appropriateness of the investment for the Regulated Fund in light of the Regulated Fund's then-current circumstances.
2. Board Approvals of Co-Investment Transactions.

(a) If the Adviser deems a Regulated Fund's participation in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction to be appropriate for the Regulated Fund, it will then determine an appropriate level of investment for the Regulated Fund.
(b) If the aggregate amount recommended by the Advisers to be Start Printed Page 12171invested in the Potential Co-Investment Transaction by the participating Regulated Funds and any participating Affiliated Funds, collectively, exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, the investment opportunity will be allocated among them pro rata based on the size of the Internal Orders, as described in section III.A.1.b. of the application. Each Adviser to a participating Regulated Fund will promptly notify and provide the Eligible Directors with information concerning the Affiliated Funds' and Regulated Funds' order sizes to assist the Eligible Directors with their review of the applicable Regulated Fund's investments for compliance with these Conditions.
(c) After making the determinations required in Condition 1(b) above, each Adviser to a participating Regulated Fund will distribute written information concerning the Potential Co-Investment Transaction (including the amount proposed to be invested by each participating Regulated Fund and each participating Affiliated Fund) to the Eligible Directors of its participating Regulated Fund(s) for their consideration. A Regulated Fund will enter into a Co-Investment Transaction with one or more other Regulated Funds or Affiliated Funds only if, prior to the Regulated Fund's participation in the Potential Co-Investment Transaction, a Required Majority concludes that:
(i) The terms of the transaction, including the consideration to be paid, are reasonable and fair to the Regulated Fund and its equity holders and do not involve overreaching in respect of the Regulated Fund or its equity holders on the part of any person concerned;
(ii) the transaction is consistent with:
(A) The interests of the Regulated Fund's equity holders; and
(B) the Regulated Fund's then-current Objectives and Strategies;
(iii) the investment by any other Regulated Fund(s) or Affiliated Fund(s) would not disadvantage the Regulated Fund, and participation by the Regulated Fund would not be on a basis different from, or less advantageous than, that of any other Regulated Fund(s) or Affiliated Fund(s) participating in the transaction; provided that the Required Majority shall not be prohibited from reaching the conclusions required by this Condition 2(c)(iii) if:
(A) The settlement date for another Regulated Fund or an Affiliated Fund in a Co-Investment Transaction is later than the settlement date for the Regulated Fund by no more than ten business days or earlier than the settlement date for the Regulated Fund by no more than ten business days, in either case, so long as: (x) The date on which the commitment of the Affiliated Funds and Regulated Funds is made is the same; and (y) the earliest settlement date and the latest settlement date of any Affiliated Fund or Regulated Fund participating in the transaction will occur within ten business days of each other; or
(B) any other Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund, but not the Regulated Fund itself, gains the right to nominate a director for election to a portfolio company's board of directors, the right to have a board observer or any similar right to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company so long as: (x) The Eligible Directors will have the right to ratify the selection of such director or board observer, if any; (y) the Adviser agrees to, and does, provide periodic reports to the Regulated Fund's Board with respect to the actions of such director or the information received by such board observer or obtained through the exercise of any similar right to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company; and (z) any fees or other compensation that any other Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund or any affiliated person of any other Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund receives in connection with the right of one or more Regulated Funds or Affiliated Funds to nominate a director or appoint a board observer or otherwise to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company will be shared proportionately among any participating Affiliated Funds (who may, in turn, share their portion with their affiliated persons) and any participating Regulated Fund(s) in accordance with the amount of each such party's investment; and
(iv) the proposed investment by the Regulated Fund will not involve compensation, remuneration or a direct or indirect [26] 
           financial benefit to the Advisers, any other Regulated Fund, the Affiliated Funds or any affiliated person of any of them (other than the parties to the Co-Investment Transaction), except (A) to the extent permitted by Condition 14, (B) to the extent permitted by Section 17(e) or 57(k), as applicable, (C) indirectly, as a result of an interest in the securities issued by one of the parties to the Co-Investment Transaction, or (D) in the case of fees or other compensation described in Condition 2(c)(iii)(B)(z).
3. Right to Decline. Each Regulated Fund has the right to decline to participate in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction or to invest less than the amount proposed.
4. General Limitation. Except for Follow-On Investments made in accordance with Conditions 8 and 9 below,[27] 
           a Regulated Fund will not invest in reliance on the Order in any issuer in which a Related Party has an investment.[28] 

5. Same Terms and Conditions. A Regulated Fund will not participate in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction unless (i) the terms, conditions, price, class of securities to be purchased, date on which the commitment is entered into and registration rights (if any) will be the same for each participating Regulated Fund and Affiliated Fund and (ii) the earliest settlement date and the latest settlement date of any participating Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund will occur as close in time as practicable and in no event more than ten business days apart. The grant to one or more Regulated Funds or Affiliated Funds, but not the respective Regulated Fund, of the right to nominate a director for election to a portfolio company's board of directors, the right to have an observer on the board of directors or similar rights to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company will not be interpreted so as to violate this Condition 5, if Condition 2(c)(iii)(B) is met.
6. Standard Review Dispositions.

(a) General. If any Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund elects to sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of an interest in a security and one or more Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds have previously participated in a Co-Start Printed Page 12172Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer, then:
(i) The Adviser to such Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund will notify each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer of the proposed Disposition at the earliest practical time; and
(ii) the Adviser to each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer will formulate a recommendation as to participation by such Regulated Fund in the Disposition.
(b) Same Terms and Conditions. Each Regulated Fund will have the right to participate in such Disposition on a proportionate basis, at the same price and on the same terms and conditions as those applicable to the Affiliated Funds and any other Regulated Fund.
(c) No Board Approval Required. A Regulated Fund may participate in such a Disposition without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if:
(i)(A) The participation of each Regulated Fund and Affiliated Fund in such Disposition is proportionate to its then-current holding of the security (or securities) of the issuer that is (or are) the subject of the Disposition; [29] 
           (B) the Board of the Regulated Fund has approved as being in the best interests of the Regulated Fund the ability to participate in such Dispositions on a pro rata basis (as described in greater detail in the application); and (C) the Board of the Regulated Fund is provided on a quarterly basis with a list of all Dispositions made in accordance with this Condition; or
(ii) each security is a Tradable Security and (A) the Disposition is not to the issuer or any affiliated person of the issuer; and (B) the security is sold for cash in a transaction in which the only term negotiated by or on behalf of the participating Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds is price.
(d) Standard Board Approval. In all other cases, the Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to the Regulated Fund's participation to the Eligible Directors and the Regulated Fund will participate in such Disposition solely to the extent that a Required Majority determines that it is in the Regulated Fund's best interests.
7. Enhanced Review Dispositions.

(a) General. If any Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund elects to sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of a Pre-Boarding Investment in a Potential Co-Investment Transaction and the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds have not previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer:
(i) The Adviser to such Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund will notify each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer of the proposed Disposition at the earliest practical time;
(ii) the Adviser to each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer will formulate a recommendation as to participation by such Regulated Fund in the Disposition; and
(iii) the Advisers will provide to the Board of each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer all information relating to the existing investments in the issuer of the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds, including the terms of such investments and how they were made, that is necessary for the Required Majority to make the findings required by this Condition.
(b) Enhanced Board Approval. The Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to the Regulated Fund's participation to the Eligible Directors, and the Regulated Fund will participate in such Disposition solely to the extent that a Required Majority determines that:
(i) The Disposition complies with Conditions 2(c)(i), (ii), (iii)(A), and (iv);
(ii) the making and holding of the Pre-Boarding Investments were not prohibited by Section 57 or Rule 17d-1, as applicable, and records the basis for the finding in the Board minutes.
(c) Additional Requirements. The Disposition may only be completed in reliance on the Order if:
(i) Same Terms and Conditions. Each Regulated Fund has the right to participate in such Disposition on a proportionate basis, at the same price and on the same terms and conditions as those applicable to the Affiliated Funds and any other Regulated Fund;
(ii) Original Investments. All of the Affiliated Funds' and Regulated Funds' investments in the issuer are Pre-Boarding Investments;
(iii) Advice of counsel. Independent counsel to the Board advises that the making and holding of the investments in the Pre-Boarding Investments were not prohibited by Section 57 (as modified by Rule 57b-1) or Rule 17d-1, as applicable;
(iv) Multiple Classes of Securities. All Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds that hold Pre-Boarding Investments in the issuer immediately before the time of completion of the Co-Investment Transaction hold the same security or securities of the issuer. For the purpose of determining whether the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds hold the same security or securities, they may disregard any security held by some but not all of them if, prior to relying on the Order, the Required Majority is presented with all information necessary to make a finding, and finds, that: (x) Any Regulated Fund's or Affiliated Fund's holding of a different class of securities (including for this purpose a security with a different maturity date) is immaterial [30] 
           in amount, including immaterial relative to the size of the issuer; and (y) the Board records the basis for any such finding in its minutes. In addition, securities that differ only in respect of issuance date, currency, or denominations may be treated as the same security; and
(v) No control. The Affiliated Funds, the other Regulated Funds and their affiliated persons (within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3)(C) of the Act), individually or in the aggregate, do not control the issuer of the securities (within the meaning of Section 2(a)(9) of the Act).
8. Standard Review Follow-Ons.

(a) General. If any Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund desires to make a Follow-On Investment in an issuer and the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds holding investments in the issuer previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer:
(i) The Adviser to each such Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund will notify each Regulated Fund that holds securities of the portfolio company of the proposed transaction at the earliest practical time; and
(ii) the Adviser to each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer will formulate a recommendation as to the proposed participation, including the amount of the proposed investment, by such Regulated Fund.
(b) No Board Approval Required. A Regulated Fund may participate in the Follow-On Investment without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if:
(i)(A) The proposed participation of each Regulated Fund and each Affiliated Fund in such investment is proportionate to its outstanding investments in the issuer or the security at issue, as appropriate,[31] 
           immediately Start Printed Page 12173preceding the Follow-On Investment; and (B) the Board of the Regulated Fund has approved as being in the best interests of the Regulated Fund the ability to participate in Follow-On Investments on a pro rata basis (as described in greater detail in the Application); or
(ii) it is a Non-Negotiated Follow-On Investment.
(c) Standard Board Approval. In all other cases, the Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to the Regulated Fund's participation to the Eligible Directors and the Regulated Fund will participate in such Follow-On Investment solely to the extent that a Required Majority makes the determinations set forth in Condition 2(c). If the only previous Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer was an Enhanced Review Disposition the Eligible Directors must complete this review of the proposed Follow-On Investment both on a stand-alone basis and together with the Pre-Boarding Investments in relation to the total economic exposure and other terms of the investment.
(d) Allocation. If, with respect to any such Follow-On Investment:
(i) The amount of the opportunity proposed to be made available to any Regulated Fund is not based on the Regulated Funds' and the Affiliated Funds' outstanding investments in the issuer or the security at issue, as appropriate, immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment; and
(ii) the aggregate amount recommended by the Advisers to be invested in the Follow-On Investment by the participating Regulated Funds and any participating Affiliated Funds, collectively, exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, then the Follow-On Investment opportunity will be allocated among them pro rata based on the size of the Internal Orders, as described in section III.A.1.b. of the application.
(e) Other Conditions. The acquisition of Follow-On Investments as permitted by this Condition will be considered a Co-Investment Transaction for all purposes and subject to the other Conditions set forth in the application.
9. Enhanced Review Follow-Ons.

(a) General. If any Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund desires to make a Follow-On Investment in an issuer that is a Potential Co-Investment Transaction and the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds holding investments in the issuer have not previously participated in a Co-Investment Transaction with respect to the issuer:
(i) The Adviser to each such Regulated Fund or Affiliated Fund will notify each Regulated Fund that holds securities of the portfolio company of the proposed transaction at the earliest practical time;
(ii) the Adviser to each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer will formulate a recommendation as to the proposed participation, including the amount of the proposed investment, by such Regulated Fund; and
(iii) the Advisers will provide to the Board of each Regulated Fund that holds an investment in the issuer all information relating to the existing investments in the issuer of the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds, including the terms of such investments and how they were made, that is necessary for the Required Majority to make the findings required by this Condition.
(b) Enhanced Board Approval. The Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to the Regulated Fund's participation to the Eligible Directors, and the Regulated Fund will participate in such Follow-On Investment solely to the extent that a Required Majority reviews the proposed Follow-On Investment both on a stand-alone basis and together with the Pre-Boarding Investments in relation to the total economic exposure and other terms and makes the determinations set forth in Condition 2(c). In addition, the Follow-On Investment may only be completed in reliance on the Order if the Required Majority of each participating Regulated Fund determines that the making and holding of the Pre-Boarding Investments were not prohibited by Section 57 (as modified by Rule 57b-1) or Rule 17d-1, as applicable. The basis for the Board's findings will be recorded in its minutes.
(c) Additional Requirements. The Follow-On Investment may only be completed in reliance on the Order if:
(i) Original Investments. All of the Affiliated Funds' and Regulated Funds' investments in the issuer are Pre-Boarding Investments;
(ii) Advice of counsel. Independent counsel to the Board advises that the making and holding of the investments in the Pre-Boarding Investments were not prohibited by Section 57 (as modified by Rule 57b-1) or Rule 17d-1, as applicable;
(iii) Multiple Classes of Securities. All Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds that hold Pre-Boarding Investments in the issuer immediately before the time of completion of the Co-Investment Transaction hold the same security or securities of the issuer. For the purpose of determining whether the Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds hold the same security or securities, they may disregard any security held by some but not all of them if, prior to relying on the Order, the Required Majority is presented with all information necessary to make a finding, and finds, that: (x) Any Regulated Fund's or Affiliated Fund's holding of a different class of securities (including for this purpose a security with a different maturity date) is immaterial in amount, including immaterial relative to the size of the issuer; and (y) the Board records the basis for any such finding in its minutes. In addition, securities that differ only in respect of issuance date, currency, or denominations may be treated as the same security; and
(iv) No control. The Affiliated Funds, the other Regulated Funds and their affiliated persons (within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3)(C) of the Act), individually or in the aggregate, do not control the issuer of the securities (within the meaning of Section 2(a)(9) of the Act).
(d) Allocation. If, with respect to any such Follow-On Investment:
(i) The amount of the opportunity proposed to be made available to any Regulated Fund is not based on the Regulated Funds' and the Affiliated Funds' outstanding investments in the issuer or the security at issue, as appropriate, immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment; and
(ii) the aggregate amount recommended by the Advisers to be invested in the Follow-On Investment by the participating Regulated Funds and any participating Affiliated Funds, collectively, exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, then the Follow-On Investment opportunity will be allocated among them pro rata based on the size of the Internal Orders, as described in section III.A.1.b. of the application.
(e) Other Conditions. The acquisition of Follow-On Investments as permitted by this Condition will be considered a Co-Investment Transaction for all Start Printed Page 12174purposes and subject to the other Conditions set forth in the application.
10. Board Reporting, Compliance and Annual Re-Approval.

(a) Each Adviser to a Regulated Fund will present to the Board of each Regulated Fund, on a quarterly basis, and at such other times as the Board may request, (i) a record of all investments in Potential Co-Investment Transactions made by any of the other Regulated Funds or any of the Affiliated Funds during the preceding quarter that fell within the Regulated Fund's then-current Objectives and Strategies and Board-Established Criteria that were not made available to the Regulated Fund, and an explanation of why such investment opportunities were not made available to the Regulated Fund; (ii) a record of all Follow-On Investments in and Dispositions of investments in any issuer in which the Regulated Fund holds any investments by any Affiliated Fund or other Regulated Fund during the prior quarter; and (iii) all information concerning Potential Co-Investment Transactions and Co-Investment Transactions, including investments made by other Regulated Funds or Affiliated Funds that the Regulated Fund considered but declined to participate in, so that the Independent Directors, may determine whether all Potential Co-Investment Transactions and Co-Investment Transactions during the preceding quarter, including those investments that the Regulated Fund considered but declined to participate in, comply with the Conditions.
(b) All information presented to the Regulated Fund's Board pursuant to this Condition will be kept for the life of the Regulated Fund and at least two years thereafter, and will be subject to examination by the Commission and its staff.
(c) Each Regulated Fund's chief compliance officer, as defined in rule 38a-1(a)(4), will prepare an annual report for its Board each year that evaluates (and documents the basis of that evaluation) the Regulated Fund's compliance with the terms and Conditions of the application and the procedures established to achieve such compliance. In the case of a BDC Downstream Fund that does not have a chief compliance officer, the chief compliance officer of the BDC that controls the BDC Downstream Fund will prepare the report for the relevant Independent Party.
(d) The Independent Directors (including the non-interested members of each Independent Party) will consider at least annually whether continued participation in new and existing Co-Investment Transactions is in the Regulated Fund's best interests.
11. Record Keeping. Each Regulated Fund will maintain the records required by Section 57(f)(3) of the Act as if each of the Regulated Funds were a BDC and each of the investments permitted under these Conditions were approved by the Required Majority under Section 57(f).
12. Director Independence. No Independent Director (including the non-interested members of any Independent Party) of a Regulated Fund will also be a director, general partner, managing member or principal, or otherwise be an “affiliated person” (as defined in the Act) of any Affiliated Fund.
13. Expenses. The expenses, if any, associated with acquiring, holding or disposing of any securities acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction (including, without limitation, the expenses of the distribution of any such securities registered for sale under the Securities Act) will, to the extent not payable by the Advisers under their respective advisory agreements with the Regulated Funds and the Affiliated Funds, be shared by the Regulated Funds and the participating Affiliated Funds in proportion to the relative amounts of the securities held or being acquired or disposed of, as the case may be.
14. Transaction Fees.[32] 
           Any transaction fee (including break-up, structuring, monitoring or commitment fees but excluding brokerage or underwriting compensation permitted by Section 17(e) or 57(k)) received in connection with any Co-Investment Transaction will be distributed to the participants on a pro rata basis based on the amounts they invested or committed, as the case may be, in such Co-Investment Transaction. If any transaction fee is to be held by an Adviser pending consummation of the transaction, the fee will be deposited into an account maintained by the Adviser at a bank or banks having the qualifications prescribed in Section 26(a)(1), and the account will earn a competitive rate of interest that will also be divided pro rata among the participants. None of the Advisers, the Affiliated Funds, the other Regulated Funds or any affiliated person of the Affiliated Funds or the Regulated Funds will receive any additional compensation or remuneration of any kind as a result of or in connection with a Co-Investment Transaction other than (i) in the case of the Regulated Funds and the Affiliated Funds, the pro rata transaction fees described above and fees or other compensation described in Condition 2(c)(iii)(B)(z), (ii) brokerage or underwriting compensation permitted by Section 17(e) or 57(k) or (iii) in the case of the Advisers, investment advisory compensation paid in accordance with investment advisory agreements between the applicable Regulated Fund(s) or Affiliated Fund(s) and its Adviser.
15. If the Holders own in the aggregate more than 25 percent of the Shares of a Regulated Fund, then the Holders will vote such Shares as directed by an independent third party (such as the trustee of a voting trust or a proxy adviser) when voting on (1) the election of directors; (2) the removal of one or more directors; or (3) any other matter under either the Act or applicable State law affecting the Board's composition, size or manner of election.
Start Signature
For the Commission, by the Division of Investment Management, under delegated authority.
Robert W. Errett,
Deputy Secretary.
End Signature
End Supplemental Information
Footnotes

1.
     “Regulated Funds” means AIC, ASFRF, AIF, the Future Regulated Funds and the BDC Downstream Funds (defined below). “Future Regulated Fund” means a closed-end management investment company (a) that is registered under the Act or has elected to be regulated as a BDC and (b) whose investment adviser is an Adviser.
“Adviser” means AIM, ACM and the Existing Advisers to Affiliated Funds (identified in Appendix A to the application) together with any future investment adviser that (i) controls, is controlled by or is under common control with AGM, (ii) is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act, and (iii) is not a Regulated Fund or a subsidiary of a Regulated Fund.

        Back to Citation
      


2.
     “Affiliated Fund” means any Existing Affiliated Fund (identified in Appendix A to the application) or any entity (a) whose investment adviser is an Adviser, (b) that would be an investment company but for Section 3(c)(1), 3(c)(5)(C) or 3(c)(7) of the Act and (c) that is not a BDC Downstream Fund. Applicants represent that no Existing Affiliated Fund is a BDC Downstream Fund.

        Back to Citation
      


3.
     All existing entities that currently intend to rely on the Order have been named as Applicants and any existing or future entities that may rely on the Order in the future will comply with its terms and Conditions set forth in the application.

        Back to Citation
      


4.
     Section 2(a)(48) defines a BDC to be any closed-end investment company that operates for the purpose of making investments in securities described in Section 55(a)(1) through 55(a)(3) and makes available significant managerial assistance with respect to the issuers of such securities.

        Back to Citation
      


5.
     “Board” means (i) with respect to a Regulated Fund other than a BDC Downstream Fund, the board of directors (or the equivalent) of the Regulated Fund and (ii) with respect to a BDC Downstream Fund, the Independent Party of the BDC Downstream Fund. 
“Independent Party” means, with respect to a BDC Downstream Fund, (i) if the BDC Downstream Fund has a board of directors (or the equivalent), the board or (ii) if the BDC Downstream Fund does not have a board of directors (or the equivalent), a transaction committee or advisory committee of the BDC Downstream Fund.

        Back to Citation
      


6.
     “Independent Director” means a member of the Board of any relevant entity who is not an “interested person” as defined in Section 2(a)(19) of the Act. No Independent Director of a Regulated Fund (including any non-interested member of an Independent Party) will have a financial interest in any Co-Investment Transaction, other than indirectly through share ownership in one of the Regulated Funds.

        Back to Citation
      


7.
     “BDC Downstream Fund” means either (a) with respect to AIC, Merx or (b) with respect to any Regulated Fund that is a BDC, an entity (i) that the BDC directly or indirectly controls, (ii) that is not controlled by any person other than the BDC (except a person that indirectly controls the entity solely because it controls the BDC), (iii) that would be an investment company but for section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act, (iv) whose investment adviser is an Adviser and (v) that is not a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub.

        Back to Citation
      


8.
     Applicants believe that allowing the other Regulated Funds and the Affiliated Funds to co-invest with Merx does not raise any legal or policy concerns that are not otherwise raised by allowing a Regulated Fund to co-invest with another Regulated Fund and/or one or more Affiliated Funds because, in terms of its operation and purpose, Merx differs from a private fund only in that it invests in and operates aircraft subject to leases instead of in investment securities.

        Back to Citation
      


9.
     Applicants state that, although Athene and MidCap may not rely on section 3(c)(1), 3(c)(5)(c) or 3(c)(7) of the Act, as do the other Existing Affiliated Funds, Applicants do not believe that allowing Athene and MidCap to participate in Co-investment Transactions as Affiliated Funds raises any additional legal or policy concerns not otherwise raised by allowing a Regulated Fund to co-invest with one or more Affiliated Funds. Specifically, Applicants argue that Athene and MidCap are clients of Advisers the same way that an Affiliated Fund relying on Section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) is a client of an Adviser. Although a relatively small portion of Athene's assets are managed by an investment adviser that is not an Adviser, only the portion of Athene's assets for which an Adviser has investment discretion will participate in Co-investment Transactions. Athene and MidCap may continue to be an Affiliated Fund in the future if it instead relies solely on Section 3(c)(1), 3(c)(5)(C) or 3(c)(7) and otherwise satisfies the criteria for an “Affiliated Fund” set out in the definition thereof.

        Back to Citation
      


10.
     “Wholly-Owned Investment Sub” means an entity (i) that is wholly-owned by one of AIC, ASFRF, AIF or a Future Regulated Fund (with such Regulated Fund at all times holding, beneficially and of record, 100% of the voting and economic interests); (ii) whose sole business purpose is to hold one or more investments on behalf of such Regulated Fund; (iii) with respect to which such Regulated Fund's Board has the sole authority to make all determinations with respect to the entity's participation under the Conditions; and (iv) that would be an investment company but for Section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act.

        Back to Citation
      


11.
     “Objectives and Strategies” means (i) with respect to any Regulated Fund other than a BDC Downstream Fund, its investment objectives and strategies, as described in its most current registration statement on Form N-2, other current filings with the Commission under the Securities Act of 1933 (the “Securities Act”) or under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and its most current report to stockholders, and (ii) with respect to any BDC Downstream Fund, those investment objectives and strategies described in its disclosure documents (including private placement memoranda and reports to equity holders) and organizational documents (including operating agreements).

        Back to Citation
      


12.
     “Board-Established Criteria” means criteria that the Board of a Regulated Fund may establish from time to time to describe the characteristics of Potential Co-Investment Transactions regarding which the Adviser to the Regulated Fund should be notified under Condition 1. The Board-Established Criteria will be consistent with the Regulated Fund's Objectives and Strategies. If no Board-Established Criteria are in effect, then the Regulated Fund's Adviser will be notified of all Potential Co-Investment Transactions that fall within the Regulated Fund's then-current Objectives and Strategies. Board-Established Criteria will be objective and testable, meaning that they will be based on observable information, such as industry/sector of the issuer, minimum EBITDA of the issuer, asset class of the investment opportunity or required commitment size, and not on characteristics that involve a discretionary assessment. The Adviser to the Regulated Fund may from time to time recommend criteria for the Board's consideration, but Board-Established Criteria will only become effective if approved by a majority of the Independent Directors. The Independent Directors of a Regulated Fund may at any time rescind, suspend or qualify its approval of any Board-Established Criteria, though Applicants anticipate that, under normal circumstances, the Board would not modify these criteria more often than quarterly.

        Back to Citation
      


13.
     The reason for any such adjustment to a proposed order amount will be documented in writing and preserved in the records of the Advisers.

        Back to Citation
      


14.
     “Required Majority” means a required majority, as defined in Section 57(o) of the Act. In the case of a Regulated Fund that is a registered closed-end fund, the Board members that make up the Required Majority will be determined as if the Regulated Fund were a BDC subject to Section 57(o). In the case of a BDC Downstream Fund with a board of directors (or the equivalent), the members that make up the Required Majority will be determined as if the BDC Downstream Fund were a BDC subject to Section 57(o). In the case of a BDC Downstream Fund with a transaction committee or advisory committee, the committee members that make up the Required Majority will be determined as if the BDC Downstream Fund were a BDC subject to Section 57(o) and as if the committee members were directors of the fund.

        Back to Citation
      


15.
     The Advisers will maintain records of all proposed order amounts, Internal Orders and External Submissions in conjunction with Potential Co-Investment Transactions. Each applicable Adviser will provide the Eligible Directors with information concerning the Affiliated Funds' and Regulated Funds' order sizes to assist the Eligible Directors with their review of the applicable Regulated Fund's investments for compliance with the Conditions.
“Eligible Directors” means, with respect to a Regulated Fund and a Potential Co-Investment Transaction, the members of the Regulated Fund's Board eligible to vote on that Potential Co-Investment Transaction under Section 57(o) of the Act.

        Back to Citation
      


16.
     However, if the size of the opportunity is decreased such that the aggregate of the original Internal Orders would exceed the amount of the remaining investment opportunity, then upon submitting any revised order amount to the Board of a Regulated Fund for approval, the Adviser to the Regulated Fund will also notify the Board promptly of the amount that the Regulated Fund would receive if the remaining investment opportunity were allocated pro rata on the basis of the size of the original Internal Orders. The Board of the Regulated Fund will then either approve or disapprove of the investment opportunity in accordance with condition 2, 6, 7, 8 or 9, as applicable.

        Back to Citation
      


17.
     “Follow-On Investment” means an additional investment in the same issuer, including, but not limited to, through the exercise of warrants, conversion privileges or other rights to purchase securities of the issuer.

        Back to Citation
      


18.
     “Pre-Boarding Investments” are investments in an issuer held by a Regulated Fund as well as one or more Affiliated Funds and/or one or more other Regulated Funds that: (i) were acquired prior to participating in any Co-Investment Transaction; (ii) were acquired in transactions in which the only term negotiated by or on behalf of such funds was price; and (iii) were acquired either: (A) in reliance on one of the JT No-Action Letters (defined below); or (B) in transactions occurring at least 90 days apart and without coordination between the Regulated Fund and any Affiliated Fund or other Regulated Fund.

        Back to Citation
      


19.
     A “Pro Rata Follow-On Investment” is a Follow-On Investment (i) in which the participation of each Affiliated Fund and each Regulated Fund is proportionate to its outstanding investments in the issuer or security, as appropriate, immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment, and (ii) in the case of a Regulated Fund, a majority of the Board has approved the Regulated Fund's participation in the pro rata Follow-On Investments as being in the best interests of the Regulated Fund. The Regulated Fund's Board may refuse to approve, or at any time rescind, suspend or qualify, its approval of Pro Rata Follow-On Investments, in which case all subsequent Follow-On Investments will be submitted to the Regulated Fund's Eligible Directors in accordance with Condition 8(c).

        Back to Citation
      


20.
     A “Non-Negotiated Follow-On Investment” is a Follow-On Investment in which a Regulated Fund participates together with one or more Affiliated Funds and/or one or more other Regulated Funds (i) in which the only term negotiated by or on behalf of the funds is price and (ii) with respect to which, if the transaction were considered on its own, the funds would be entitled to rely on one of the JT No-Action Letters. 
“JT No-Action Letters” means SMC Capital, Inc., SEC No-Action Letter (pub. avail. Sept. 5, 1995) and Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company, SEC No-Action Letter (pub. avail. June 7, 2000).

        Back to Citation
      


21.
     “Disposition” means the sale, exchange or other disposition of an interest in a security of an issuer.

        Back to Citation
      


22.
     However, with respect to an issuer, if a Regulated Fund's first Co-Investment Transaction is an Enhanced Review Disposition, and the Regulated Fund does not dispose of its entire position in the Enhanced Review Disposition, then before such Regulated Fund may complete its first Standard Review Follow-On in such issuer, the Eligible Directors must review the proposed Follow-On Investment not only on a stand-alone basis but also in relation to the total economic exposure in such issuer (i.e., in combination with the portion of the Pre-Boarding Investment not disposed of in the Enhanced Review Disposition), and the other terms of the investments. This additional review would be required because such findings would not have been required in connection with the prior Enhanced Review Disposition, but they would have been required had the first Co-Investment Transaction been an Enhanced Review Follow-On.

        Back to Citation
      


23.
     A “Pro Rata Disposition” is a Disposition (i) in which the participation of each Affiliated Fund and each Regulated Fund is proportionate to its outstanding investment in the security subject to Disposition immediately preceding the Disposition; and (ii) in the case of a Regulated Fund, a majority of the Board has approved the Regulated Fund's participation in pro rata Dispositions as being in the best interests of the Regulated Fund. The Regulated Fund's Board may refuse to approve, or at any time rescind, suspend or qualify, its approval of Pro Rata Dispositions, in which case all subsequent Dispositions will be submitted to the Regulated Fund's Eligible Directors.

        Back to Citation
      


24.
     “Tradable Security” means a security that meets the following criteria at the time of Disposition: (i) It trades on a national securities exchange or designated offshore securities market as defined in rule 902(b) under the Securities Act; (ii) it is not subject to restrictive agreements with the issuer or other security holders; and (iii) it trades with sufficient volume and liquidity (findings as to which are documented by the Advisers to any Regulated Funds holding investments in the issuer and retained for the life of the Regulated Fund) to allow each Regulated Fund to dispose of its entire position remaining after the proposed Disposition within a short period of time not exceeding 30 days at approximately the value (as defined by section 2(a)(41) of the Act) at which the Regulated Fund has valued the investment.

        Back to Citation
      


25.
     Applicants state this may occur for two reasons. First, when the Affiliated Fund or Regulated Fund is not yet fully funded because, when the Affiliated Fund or Regulated Fund desires to make an investment, it must call capital from its investors to obtain the financing to make the investment, and in these instances, the notice requirement to call capital could be as much as ten business days. Second, where, for tax or regulatory reasons, an Affiliated Fund or Regulated Fund does not purchase new issuances immediately upon issuance but only after a short seasoning period of up to ten business days.

        Back to Citation
      


26.
     For example, procuring the Regulated Fund's investment in a Potential Co-Investment Transaction to permit an affiliate to complete or obtain better terms in a separate transaction would constitute an indirect financial benefit.

        Back to Citation
      


27.
     This exception applies only to Follow-On Investments by a Regulated Fund in issuers in which that Regulated Fund already holds investments.

        Back to Citation
      


28.
     “Related Party” means (i) any Close Affiliate and (ii) in respect of matters as to which any Adviser has knowledge, any Remote Affiliate.
 “Close Affiliate” means the Advisers, the Regulated Funds, the Affiliated Funds and any other person described in Section 57(b) (after giving effect to Rule 57b-1) in respect of any Regulated Fund (treating any registered investment company or series thereof as a BDC for this purpose) except for limited partners included solely by reason of the reference in Section 57(b) to Section 2(a)(3)(D).
“Remote Affiliate” means any person described in Section 57(e) in respect of any Regulated Fund (treating any registered investment company or series thereof as a BDC for this purpose) and any limited partner holding 5% or more of the relevant limited partner interests that would be a Close Affiliate but for the exclusion in that definition.

        Back to Citation
      


29.
     In the case of any Disposition, proportionality will be measured by each participating Regulated Fund's and Affiliated Fund's outstanding investment in the security in question immediately preceding the Disposition.

        Back to Citation
      


30.
     In determining whether a holding is “immaterial” for purposes of the Order, the Required Majority will consider whether the nature and extent of the interest in the transaction or arrangement is sufficiently small that a reasonable person would not believe that the interest affected the determination of whether to enter into the transaction or arrangement or the terms of the transaction or arrangement.

        Back to Citation
      


31.
     To the extent that a Follow-On Investment opportunity is in a security or arises in respect of a security held by the participating Regulated Funds and Affiliated Funds, proportionality will be measured by each participating Regulated Fund's and Affiliated Fund's outstanding investment in the security in question immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment using the most recent available valuation thereof. To the extent that a Follow-On Investment opportunity relates to an opportunity to invest in a security that is not in respect of any security held by any of the participating Regulated Funds or Affiliated Funds, proportionality will be measured by each participating Regulated Fund's and Affiliated Fund's outstanding investment in the issuer immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment using the most recent available valuation thereof.

        Back to Citation
      


32.
     Applicants are not requesting and the Commission is not providing any relief for transaction fees received in connection with any Co-Investment Transaction.

        Back to Citation
      


[FR Doc. 2016-05043 Filed 3-7-16; 8:45 am]
BILLING CODE 8011-01-P


Published Document 



















Home

Home



Sections

Money
Environment
World
Science & Technology
Business & Industry
Health & Public Welfare



Browse

Agencies
Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)
Dates
Public Inspection
Executive Orders



Search

Document Search
Advanced Document Search
Public Inspection Search





Reader Aids

Office of the Federal Register Blog
Using FederalRegister.Gov
Understanding the Federal Register
Recent Site Updates
Videos & Tutorials
Developer Resources
Government Policy and OFR Procedures



My FR

My Clipboard
My Subscriptions
My Comments
Sign In



Social Media

Facebook
Twitter



Information

About This Site
Legal Status
Contact Us
Privacy
Accessibility
FOIA
No Fear Act
Continuity Information







    Site Feedback
  















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/25/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.11
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							-$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/25/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.47%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/25/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.88%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Tue Jul 25 23:14:13 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now














































JPMorgan Total Return Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan Total Return Fund(JMTAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewPerformanceFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
  




Designed ToDesigned to deliver high total return through investing in a wide range of debt securities.ApproachUtilizes a dynamic approach that combines traditional fixed income with opportunistic investingEmploys a top-down, macro-driven approach to help mitigate risks of benchmark-constrained strategiesSelects investments by analyzing the performance potential of individual securities and different market sectors










Overview widget loading ...







Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William  Eigen Portfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: Total Return (A)




Commentary: Total Return







Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - Total Return Fund




Supplemental Data Sheet - Total Return Fund


Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan Total Return Fund







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 




Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 0.66% for A Shares, 1.31% for C Shares, 0.56% for I Shares, 1.16% for R2 Shares, 0.46% for R5 Shares and 0.41% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 6/30/2017 for A Shares, 6/30/2017 for C Shares, 6/30/2017 for I Shares, 6/30/2017 for R2 Shares, 6/30/2017 for R5 Shares and 6/30/2017 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index is an unmanaged index representing SEC-registered taxable and dollar denominated securities. It covers the U.S. investment grade fixed rate bond market, with index components for government and corporate securities, mortgage pass-through, and asset-backed securities. The performance of the Lipper Core Plus Bond Funds Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. The value of investments in mortgage-related and asset-backed securities will be influenced by the factors affecting the housing market and the assets underlying such securities. The securities may decline in value, face valuation difficulties, become more volatile and/or become illiquid. They are also subject to prepayment risk, which occurs when mortgage holders refinance or otherwise repay their loans sooner than expected, creating an early return of principal to holders of the loans. The Fund may use futures contracts, swaps, and derivatives in connection with its investment strategies. Derivatives are subject to the risk that changes in the value of a derivative may not correlate perfectly with the underlying asset, rate or index.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 

















Principle #1: Plan on Living a Long Time - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar








PRINCIPLE #1: PLAN ON LIVING A LONG TIME

DON’T LET YOUR CLIENTS' MONEY RUN OUT

Your clients are living longer, and many of them haven't saved enough. Use our Principles for Successful Long-Term Investing to talk to them about this reality, and to help them be prepared.
ACCESS ALL 7 PRINCIPLES







 














We are living longer

Thanks to advances in medicine and healthier lifestyles, people who are 65 today have a very good chance of reaching ages 80 or 90. A 65-year-old couple might be surprised to learn that at least one of them has a 48% probability of living another 25 years and needing investments to last until age 90.

	 

Many of us have not saved enough

Studies reveal that individuals do not feel adequately prepared for retirement. Investors should start early by saving more, investing with discipline and having a plan for their future.

	 

	 

Explore More Principles

Learn more about successful long-term investing
   NEXT PRINCIPLE   >   






4 STRATEGIES FOR LONG-TERM INVESTORS

We offer investment strategies covering all asset classes for diversification and risk management to help you and your clients build stronger portfolios.
ACCESS 4 HIGH CONVICTION FUNDS



Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.




